<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881102-0049 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-02-88.f2.A1048</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 53, No. 212 / Wednesday, November 2, 1988/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Assistant Secretary for Housing_Federal Housing Commissioner</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">24 CFR Parts 813 and 885</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-88-1418; FR-2476]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Loans for Housing for the Elderly or Handicapped; Section 202, Projectsfor Nonelderly Handicapped Families</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Assistant Secretary for Housing_FederalHousing Commissioner, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 authorizes HUDto provide direct loans for the development of projects to serve elderlyor handicapped families and individuals. Section 202 was amended by section162 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-242,approved February 5, 1988) to ensure that the Section 202 program willmeet the special housing and related needs of nonelderly handicapped familiesand individuals. The revised program authorizes a new type of project assistancepayment to replace assistance payments made under section 8 of the UnitedStates Housing Act of 1937. This proposed rule would implement the newprogram.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be submitted on or before January 3, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Comments on proposal: Interested persons are invitedto submit comments to the Rules Docket Clerk, Office of the General Counsel,Room 10276, Department of Housing and Urban Development, 451 Seventh Street,SW., Washington, DC 20410. Comments should refer to the above docket numberand title. A copy of each comment received will be available for publicinspection during regular business hours at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Margaret Milner, Office of Policy,Financial Management and Administration, Room 9106, Department of Housingand Urban Development, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410. Telephone(202) 755-6490 (voice or TDD). (This is not a toll-free number.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The information collection requirementscontained in this rule have been submitted to the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) for review under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980.No person may be subjected to a penalty for failure to comply with theseinformation collection requirements until they have been approved and assignedan OMB control number. The OMB control number, when assigned, will be announcedby separate notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Public reporting burden for this collectionof information is estimated to include the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Informationon the estimated public reporting burden is provided under the Preambleheading <T3>Other Matters</T3>. Send comments regarding this burden estimate orany other aspect of this collection of information, including suggestionsfor reducing this burden, to the Department of Housing and Urban Development,Rules Docket Clerk, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Room 10276, Washington DC20410 and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Office ofManagement and Budget, Washington, DC 20503. <ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 authorizes HUD to provide directloans for the development of projects to serve elderly or handicapped familiesand individuals. Projects selected for section 202 loans also receive commitmentsfor rental assistance payments under section 8 of the United States HousingAct of 1937. To improve the direct loan program and to better serve thespecial housing and related needs of nonelderly handicapped families andindividuals, section 162 of the Housing and Community Development Act of1987 (Pub. L. 100-242, approved February 5, 1988) (1987 Act) amended section202. Section 162 includes a new type of assistance payment to replace section8 assistance payments made in connection with section 202 projects forhandicapped families and individuals. This proposed rule would implementthe new program.<ITAG tagnum="84">Procedural Matters</ITAG>I. Issuance of Final RulesSection 162(e) of the 1987 Act directed HUD to publish a notice of fundavailability in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>implementing the provisions of section 162 tothe extent that funds are approved in an appropriations act for use forsection 202 housing for handicapped families and individuals. This noticewas to be published not later than 120 days following the date of the enactmentof the 1987 Act (February 5, 1988). This section also directed HUD to issuesuch rules as may be necessary to carry out these provisions and amendmentsfor fiscal year 1989 and thereafter.Since no appropriation for the new program was contained in HUD's regularappropriation for Fiscal Year 1988, HUD did not issue the described noticeof fund availability. Final rules based on the proposed rule publishedtoday, however, should be effective for projects to be funded with FiscalYear 1989 appropriations.II. Compliance With the Federal Advisory Committee ActSection 202(h)(3)(A), as amended by section 162, provides that in adoptingstandards and procedures for allocating funds and processing loans andassistance payments, HUD shall ensure adequate participation by representativesof the disability community through the provisions available under theFederal Advisory Committee Act.Notwithstanding this statutory mandate for the participation of the disabilitycommunity through the formation of an advisory committee in accordancewith FACA, HUD does not believe that it is necessary to form the advisorycommittee prior to the issuance of this proposed rule. As noted above,HUD is also required to issue such rules as may be necessary to carry outsection 162 for the 1989 fiscal year program. In order to issue such finalrules in compliance with legislative review requirements under section7(o) of the Department of Housing and Urban Development Act, HUD was requiredto complete the development of this proposed rule by September 1988, andwill be required to issue a final rule in early 1989. In light of thesedeadlines, HUD did not believe that there was a sufficient amount of timeto charter a committee, notify the public of the committee's meetings,and afford the members of the committee an opportunity to address the newsection 202 requirements. Accordingly, this proposed rule was developedwithout the benefit of an advisory committee under FACA. (HUD has, however,initiated informal consultations with the members of the disability communityin the preparation of this proposed rule.) HUD intends to establish andconsult with an advisory committee in accordance with FACA requirementsin the development of the final rule. III. Prototype Demonstration Section 202(h)(3)(B) of the Act provides that the Secretary may, on a demonstrationbasis, determine the feasibility and desirability of reducing processingtime and costs for housing for handicapped families by limiting projectdesign to a small number of prototype designs. HUD is currently examiningthe feasibility of developing such a prototype program but has not, asyet, determined whether the prototype demonstration will be implemented.If HUD decides to pursue the prototype demonstration, the requirementsof the program will be set forth in a separate notice. HUD encourages interestedparties to address the desirability of such a prototype demonstration intheir comments on this proposed rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">Section 202 Program_Housing for Handicapped Families </ITAG>I. Overview Prior to the 1987 Act, housing for nonelderly handicapped families wasassisted under section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 and section 8 ofthe United States Housing Act of 1937. Because the section 202/8 housingprogram was designed and implemented primarily to assist in the developmentand operation of multifamily rental projects for elderly families, Congressfound that the program was often inappropriate for dealing with the specializedneeds of physically impaired, developmentally disabled, and chronicallymentally ill people, and was often more expensive than necessary, therebyreducing the number of families that could be assisted with available funds.To make the section 202 program more efficient and less costly, section162 of the Act provides for the adoption of standards and procedures applicableonly to housing for handicapped families. Such standards and proceduresare intended to: (1) Eliminate cost containment procedures that do notadequately reflect the necessity for building designs to meet the needsof the residents, and do not recognize State and local standards for theoperation of the homes; (2) eliminate procedures and requirements thatare time consuming and unnecessarily costly and that prevent the developmentof section 202 housing for handicapped families in some areas; (3) substitutea more appropriate subsidy method for the section 8 housing assistancepayment; (4) increase the emphasis on supportive services and greater useof State and local funds; (5) provide an improved program of section 202housing for handicapped families that will assist in providing shelterand supportive services for mentally ill persons that would otherwise behomeless. (See section 162(a)(1).) While the proposed rule adopts many of the same standards and procedurescurrently employed in the section 202/8 program, the rule includes severalmajor changes to these procedures designed to serve the cited purposes.These include:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Allocation procedures that provide greater flexibility with regardto the selection of allocation areas and that eliminate requirements thata specified percentage of funds be available for use in nonmetropolitanareas. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Provisions that eliminate the time consuming, costly and potentiallyunnecessary requirement that each Sponsor form a Borrower corporation beforethe application for fund reservation is submitted. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Elimination of the limit on the number of units for which a Sponsormay apply. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Revised requirements that provide for the timely development of projectsby encouraging Sponsors and Borrowers to submit site information expeditiously.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Requirements that increase the emphasis of the program on supportiveservices and the greater use of State and local funds. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Cost containment procedures that rely on a limited number of costcontainment and modest design requirements, and eliminate the need fordetailed cost containment reviews. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Minimum design standards that increase project design flexibility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Maximum loan amounts that are based on total development costs andon unit cost limits developed separately for group homes and independentliving complexes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Operating cost budgets that are based on the reasonable and necessarycost of operating the project rather than the amount supportable withinthe Fair Market Rent limits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Provisions that encourage acquisition as a development method forgroup homes by allowing the same funding levels for acquisition as fornew construction or substantial rehabilitation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Construction contracting provisions that eliminate competitive bidrequirements. </ITAG>II. Applicability The proposed rule would revise andSection;885.1 (``Purposes and policy'')to add a new paragraph (c) addressing the applicability of the varioussubparts of Part 885. Paragraph (c)(1) would provide that existing SubpartsB through D would apply to projects for the elderly or handicapped thatreceive loans under section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 and housingassistance payments under section 8 of the United States Housing Act. Thisparagraph would also implement the requirements of section 162(d) of the1987 Act (``Termination of Section 8 Assistance'') which provides that``on and after the first date that amounts approved in an appropriationsAct for any fiscal year become available for contracts under section 202(h)(4)(A)* * * no project for handicapped (primarily nonelderly) families approvedfor such fiscal year pursuant to section 202 * * * shall be provided assistancepayments under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, exceptpursuant to a reservation for a contract to make such assistance paymentsthat was made before that date.'' Section 885.1(c)(2) would state that Subpart G applies to projects forhandicapped families receiving loans under section 202 and project assistanceunder section 202(h) of the Housing Act of 1959. In accordance with section162(f) of the 1987 Act, this proposed paragraph would also provide thatSubpart G may apply to a project that received a reservation of loan authorityunder section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 and a reservation of contractauthority under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 underSubparts B through D, under the circumstances described in andSection;885.775.Under andSection;885.775, a Sponsor or Borrower of such a project may, atany time before initial loan closing, request HUD to substitute projectassistance payments under Subpart G for the section 8 housing assistancepayments. After HUD completes its selections for funding in a fiscal yearand to the extent that funds are available for the substitution, HUD mayapprove such a request if: (1) The project is eligible for assistance underSubpart G; and (2) the project is financially infeasible with contractrents limited by the section 8 Fair Market Rents, or the substitution wouldotherwise facilitate the development of the project in a timely manner.  III. Application Procedures<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Allocation of Authority</ITAG>1. <T3>Allocation of funds. </T3>Section 213(d) of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1974 sets forth the requirements for the allocationof funds under various HUD programs, including the Section 202 program.Under this statute, section 202 funds are currently allocated in the followingmanner. Up to 15 percent of the total available funds are retained in theHeadquarters Reserve for subsequent allocation to specific areas meetingstated statutory requirements. The remaining funds, less an estimated amountfor amendments, are allocated to each field office on the basis of a ``fairshare'' distribution. The fair share distribution is based on a formulawhich considers the following elements: Number of total elderly renterhouseholds; number of elderly renter households with incomes at or belowthe very low-income limits and with specified housing deficiencies; andnumber of handicapped individuals as determined from census data on thedisabled. From 20 to 25 percent of the available funds are allocated tononmetropolitan areas to meet rural housing needs. Amounts allocated toa State cannot be reallocated for use in another State unless the Secretarydetermines that other areas in the State cannot utilize the amounts withinthe same fiscal year. See Section 202 Loans for Housing for the Elderlyor Handicapped_Announcement of Fund Availability Fiscal Year 1988, publishedApril 13, 1988 (53 FR 12270) and Notice H 88-11_Fiscal Year 1988 Policyfor Loan Authority Assignments for the Section 202 Direct Loan Program.Section 202(h)(3)(A) (added by section 162 of the 1987 Act) provides thatin allocating funds for loans and assistance payments for the program ofhousing for handicapped families, ``the Secretary shall adopt such distinctstandards and procedures as the Secretary deems appropriate due to thedifferences between housing for handicapped families and other housingassisted under this section.'' HUD believes that this section providesthe Secretary with discretion to establish procedures for housing for handicappedfamilies that vary from the allocation requirements otherwise requiredfor the section 202 program under section 213 of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1974. Accordingly, HUD intends to use allocation proceduresfor the section 202 program for handicapped families that differ in twosignificant respects from the allocation procedures used in the currentsection 202 program.First, HUD believes that field office allocations for the section 202 programfor handicapped families may not always be practicable and may result insuch small dollar allocations in many field offices that feasible projectscould not be developed. Accordingly, the proposed rule permits HUD, basedon the amount of loan authority available during a fiscal year and thenumber of feasible projects that the loan authority will support, to allocateto various sized allocation areas. (Given the anticipated funding levels,HUD currently plans to make allocations on a regional basis for fiscalyear 1989.)Second, HUD does <T3>not </T3>intend to allocate from 20 to 25 percent of the availablefunds for section 202 housing for handicapped families for use in nonmetropolitanareas. The emphasis of the new program primarily is on the range of servicesprovided to the handicapped families, the opportunities for independentliving and participation in normal activities, and access by handicappedfamilies to the community at large and to employment opportunities. HUDbelieves that it is in the best interest of the program to fund the highestranked applications serving these goals, regardless of whether the locationof the project is in a nonmetropolitan or metropolitan area. Accordingly,the proposed rule would not include a nonmetropolitan allocation requirement.Funds available for housing for the elderly under the section 202/8 program,however, would continue to be subject to the nonmetropolitan allocation.In computing the amount of the nonmetropolitan allocation for elderly housing,the 20 to 25 percent factor will be applied against the amount of section202 funds available for housing for the elderly rather than the total amountof section 202 funds available.In accordance with this discussion on allocations:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Section 885.700(a) of the proposed rule states that up to 15 percentof the section 202 loan authority made available for the development costsof housing for handicapped families may be retained by the Assistant Secretaryfor subsequent allocation to specific areas and communities under the HeadquartersReserve.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Paragraph (b) would provide that the Assistant Secretary will allocatethe amounts available for development costs of housing for handicappedfamilies (less any amounts made available for amendments and for the HeadquartersReserve) to the allocation areas. The size of the allocation area willdepend on the amount of loan authority available for allocation and thenumber of feasible applications that the authority will support. The allocationof loan authority to the allocation areas would be based on a formula thatweighs the relative needs of the areas as reflected in available data onthe number of handicapped persons in the area from Census data. This datawill be adjusted to take into consideration the relative differences betweenthe areas in the costs of providing housing. Funds allocated to one areawould be reallocated to another area if the amount of loan authority allocatedto the area exceeds the amount necessary to fund all approvable applicationsfor housing for handicapped families in that area.</ITAG>2. <T3>Availability of loan authority for housing for the elderly. </T3>Section202(h)(1) of the Act provides that if the amount required for any fiscalyear for approvable applications for loans for housing for handicappedfamilies is less than the amount available, the balance shall be made availablefor loans under other provisions of section 202. In accordance with thisstatutory requirement, andSection; 885.700(c) would provide that unneededfunds made available for the development costs of housing for handicappedfamilies under subpart G may be made available for housing for the elderlyto the extent that housing assistance under section 8 of the United StatesHousing Act of 1937 is available in connection with such loan authority.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Announcement of Fund Availability and Invitations for Applications</ITAG>Section 885.705 would require HUD to publish an announcement of fund availabilityin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>for this program in addition to the announcementpublished for the section 202/8 program for housing for the elderly, andwould require each field office to publish an invitation for applicationsfor section 202 fund reservations in newspapers of general circulationserving the field office jurisdiction. The notice will also announce theschedule for workshops where applicants may receive further instructionon preparing applications.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Application Contents</ITAG>Applications for section 202 loan reservations for housing for handicappedfamilies are addressed in andSection; 885.710. The proposed rule would generallyreflect the related requirements used in the section 202/8 program (seeandSection; 885.210), with adjustments to reflect the needs of handicappedfamilies. The major changes are summarized below.1. <T3>Borrower formation. </T3>The related regulations for the section 202/8program require the Borrower to be in existence when the application forthe section 202 fund reservation is submitted and the application to includespecific information concerning the Borrower. Because the formation ofa Borrower may be time consuming, costly, and unnecessary if the applicationis not selected for funding, the proposed rule for section 202 housingfor handicapped families would allow the Sponsor to delay the formationof the Borrower until after HUD's issuance of a fund reservation. A similarprocedure was followed in Fiscal Years 1986 and 1988 for the section 202/8program. (Section 202 Loans for Housing for the Elderly or Handicapped;Announcements of Fund Availability_Fiscal Year 1986, published June 20,1986 (51 FR 22568), and Fiscal Year 1988, published April 13, 1988 (53FR 12270)). To incorporate these changes, the proposed rule would impose all applicationsubmission requirements on the Sponsor, and would require the Sponsor toprovide satisfactory evidence in the application that it will form a Borrower,cause the Borrower to file a request for determination of eligibility andrequest for direct loan processing under andSection; 885.800, and providesufficient resources to the Borrower to ensure the establishment and long-termoperation of the project. (See andSection; 885.710(b)(12)(iii).) The proposedrule at andSection; 885.750 (review of applications for fund reservation)would provide that HUD will review and rate applications based on the experienceand financial ability of the Sponsor, rather than the Borrower. The proposed rule would require the submission of all information concerningthe eligibility of the Borrower with the request for determination of Borrowereligibility under andSection; 885.800. Section 885.800(b) would require theBorrower to submit evidence concerning its identity; organization; corporatepurposes; legal authority; financial capacity; and tax exempt status; andthe identity of the Borrower's officers and directors, their past participationin HUD programs, and their certifications as to the absence of conflictsof interest. The Borrower would also be required to demonstrate that theSponsor has fulfilled its commitment to provide certain resources (seeproposed andSection; 885.710(b)(12)(iii)). Additionally, if housing consultantservices have been used by the Sponsor, the Borrower would be requiredto execute the consultant contract, and to submit the contract to HUD withthe request for determination of Borrower eligibility. 2. <T3>Site information. </T3>Under the related section 202/8 program, applicationsinvolving projects for handicapped families are required to identify thelocality in which the proposed project will be developed. Such projectsare reviewed, rated and ranked without the site information. HUD has revised these procedures slightly for section 202 housing for handicappedfamilies in order to expedite development of such projects. For example,HUD would encourage applicants to submit site information at the applicationfor fund reservation stage by permitting the assignment of additional ratingpoints in the selection process to applications that include satisfactoryevidence of an approvable site (see andSection; 885.750(c)(2)). (Such applicants,however, would not be penalized in the selection process if HUD finds thatthe site is not approvable.) Further, if an application is selected andthe Sponsor has not submitted site information by the date of issuanceof the notice of fund reservation, the notice would specify a deadline(generally not more than 60 days from the date of issuance of the noticeof fund reservation) for the submission of the site information (see andSection;885.755(a)(5)).Section 885.780 (discussed at section VI.A. below) describes the site specificinformation that must be submitted before the request for conditional commitmentand describes HUD's review of proposed sites. Section 885.800 (discussedat section VI.B., below) describes the site information that must be submittedwith the request for conditional commitment. 3. <T3>Other application requirements. </T3>Other application requirementsfor section 202 housing for handicapped families that do not reflect therelated section 202/8 program requirements include the following:a. <T3>Anticipated occupancy. </T3>Section 885.710(b)(5) provides that theSponsor must submit a narrative description that includes proposed projectrequirements that limit occupancy to chronically mentally ill, developmentallydisabled or physically handicapped residents and must demonstrate a capacityto serve the proposed occupancy group or groups. The Sponsor must alsodemonstrate that the proposal does not conflict with State or local plansand policies governing the development and operation of facilities to servehandicapped persons meeting the proposed project occupancy requirements,including policies and plans involving State funding for and support ofsupportive services and facilities for handicapped individuals. b. <T3>Supportive service plan description. </T3>Section 162(c) of the 1987Act amended section 202(f) to add requirements for the submission of asupportive service plan description. Section 885.710(b)(6) of the proposedrule implements these requirements. It provides that the supportive serviceplan must include:<ITAG tagnum="15">_A description of the category or categories, by disability type,of families the housing and facilities are intended to serve. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_A description of the range of necessary services to be provided tothe families occupying the housing, including: the names of the agencyor agencies that will be responsible for providing the supportive servicesand, if an agency is not the Sponsor, a letter of intent from the agencyincluding its willingness and ability to provide the services; the mannerin which the services will be provided to the families; the services thatwill be provided on- and off-site; and a staffing plan indicating the residentialsupervision, if any, and other staff necessary to provide the proposedsupportive services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Identification of all funding sources for supportive services thatwill be provided for compensation, including State and local funds availableto assist in the provision of services; and evidence of commitment to providesupportive services from those agencies that will provide supportive serviceswithout compensation.</ITAG>HUD believes that its implementation of the supportive service plan requirementsfor section 202 housing for handicapped families will serve the statutorygoals of increasing the emphasis of the program on supportive servicesand making greater use of State and local funds.c. <T3>Unmet needs.</T3> At proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(7), HUD has includeda requirement for the submission of evidence demonstrating that there iseffective demand for the proposed housing in the areas to be served bythe project and that the need is likely to continue for the term of theproject.d. <T3>Conflict of interest certification.</T3> Related section 202/8 programrequirements (andSection; 885.210(b)(12)) call for a certification from eachofficer and director of the Borrower and Sponsor indicating that he orshe will not receive compensation from the Borrower for services, and doesnot have any financial interest in any contract with the Borrower or inany firm or corporation that has a contract with the Borrower. This certificationis required as part of the application. Notice H87-9 (extended by NoticeH 88-9) permitted the Sponsor to defer the submission of these certifications.In lieu of certification, the application must include a resolution adoptedby the Sponsor's board of directors agreeing that the Sponsor will requireall officers and directors of the Sponsor and Borrower to execute conflictof interest certifications. The proposed rule would codify that procedureat andSection; 885.710(b)(11).Board member and officer certifications would be submitted with the Borrower'srequest for direct loan financing, and at initial and final loan closingfor any new officers and directors of the Borrower or Sponsor not includedin a previous certification. The contents of the certification would bethe same as those required under the related section 202/8 program regulations.A provision reflecting the fact that management contracts between the Borrowerand the Sponsor (or the Sponsor's nonprofit affiliate) are not prohibitedwould be included at andSection; 885.800(b). This provision is included inthe definition of ``Sponsor'' in the current program regulation.e. <T3>Evidence of nonprofit status.</T3> In order to determine whether theBorrower and Sponsor are eligible for participation in the section 202program, the proposed regulation would require the Borrower and Sponsorto provide evidence of their nonprofit status. Section andSection; 885.710(b)(12)(ii)would require a Sponsor to demonstrate that (1) It has an effective taxexemption from the Internal Revenue Service; (2) is a nonprofit organizationorganized in the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; or (3) is a nonprofit consumercooperative that is exempt from taxation under State law, has never beenliable for the payment of Federal income taxes, and does not pay patronagedividends.Consistent with the new provisions permitting deferral of formation ofthe Borrower, the proposed rule would require a Borrower to submit evidenceof its nonprofit status when it submits the request for determination ofBorrower eligibility. (See proposed andSection; 885.800(b).) The proposedrule would permit the Borrower to demonstrate that it has <T3>applied</T3> for (rather than received) an income tax exemption undersection 501(c) (3) or (4) before the request for determination of Borrowereligibility is filed. The tax exemption ruling, however, must be submittedbefore initial closing as required under andSection; 885.815(c).f. <T3>Experience of the Sponsor, including experience with minority businessenterprises.</T3> Consistent with the Department's commitment to encourageparticipation by minority business enterprises in HUD programs, under proposedandSection; 885.710(b)(15) a Sponsor would be required to include a descriptionof its involvement in programs or in the provision of services that demonstratethe Sponsor's management experience, including a description of the Sponsor'sexperience, in contracting with minority business enterprises or minoritygroups.g. <T3>Financial data.</T3> To assist the Department in determining the financialcapabilities of applicants for section 202 fund reservations, proposedandSection; 885.710(b)(19) would require the submission of evidence of theSponsor's financial ability and willingness to ensure the establishmentand long-term operation of the project and to fund the minimum capitalinvestment described at andSection; 885.810(i), including balance sheetsand statements of income and expenses for the past three years the Sponsorhas operated.h. <T3>Intergovernmental review.</T3> The proposed rule would also modifyHUD's procedures for compliance with Executive Order No. 12372, IntergovernmentalReview of Federal Programs. The related section 202/8 regulations statethat HUD will submit, or require the applicant to submit, the applicationto the State's single point of contact (SPOC) for review under 24 CFR Part52. The proposed rule for section 202 housing for handicapped familieswould require the Sponsor, rather than HUD, to submit the application tothe SPOC. HUD believes that this change will expedite the intergovernmentalreview process. These changes are incorporated in proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(21).i. <T3>Intermediate care facilities serving the mentally retarded or developmentallydisabled.</T3> To ensure that intermediate care facilities are eligiblefor assistance and will be feasible, the proposed rule at andSection; 885.710(b)(4)would require Sponsors of such projects to demonstrate that the proposedproject will primarily provide housing rather than medical facilities,is or will be licensed by appropriate State agencies, and will receivefunding for a rent contribution and the cost of intermediate care fromsources other than HUD.IV. Program Requirements<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Minimum Design Standards</ITAG>One of the major problems preventing the development of housing for handicappedfamilies under the section 202/8 program was the requirement that HUD conducta detailed cost containment review of all projects. This cost containmentreview was conducted even where a project fell within applicable limitationson loan amounts. These detailed reviews often delayed the constructionof housing for handicapped families and, in many cases, unduly limitedthe flexibility of the project design.To remedy this problem, the proposed program would eliminate HUD's detailedcost containment reviews. Cost containment would be achieved through theestablishment of development cost limits for projects and the applicationof certain cost containment and modest design standards applicable to allprojects. These standards identify specific items that HUD will not ordinarilyfund with direct loan proceeds. HUD's cost containment review under theproposed rule would be limited to determining whether the project fallswithin the development cost limits and meets the specified cost containmentand modest design standards.At the same time, to assure that projects provide an acceptable environmentfor handicapped residents, minimum standards for all projects would beestablished. These include minimum property standards, accessibility requirements,project size limitations, facility prohibitions, etc. These minimum standardswould give Borrowers the flexibility to design projects appropriate totheir location and occupancy group within broadly defined parameters.The applicable minimum design standards and cost containment and modestdesign standards are discussed below. The maximum development cost limitsare discussed at section VI.D., below.1. <T3>Project standards.</T3> Section 885.717 addresses project standards.The rule would require all projects to comply with HUD's minimum propertystandards; would prescribe accessibility requirements for all projects;and would announce minimum design requirements applicable to group homes.The group home design requirements address such matters as the minimumamount of prorated space for each resident, minimum space per residentin shared bedrooms and single occupancy rooms, and bathroom requirements.These standards are based upon HUD's experience with the development ofgroup homes under the section 202/8 program, a review of available publicationsand a survey of group home standards established by 22 States and submittedto the Department of Health and Human Services in connection with theirimplementation of the Keyes Amendment to the Social Security Act of 1976.2. <T3>Project size limitations.</T3> The proposed rule would include limitationson project size at andSection; 885.720. With the exception of the limitationon the number of residents in independent living complexes for developmentallydisabled or physically handicapped individuals_which has been reduced from40 to 24 units, the proposed limitations have regularly been incorporatedin past years' announcements of fund availability for the section 202/8program (see 1987 NOFA). The limitations reflect HUD's policy of encouraginghousing that provides for the integration of the nonelderly handicappedin the community among the nonhandicapped of all ages.The proposed rule would impose the following limitations: (1) Group homesmay not serve more than 15 persons on one site; (2) independent livingcomplexes for chronically mentally ill individuals may not serve more than20 persons on one site; and (3) independent living complexes for handicappedfamilies in developmentally disabled or physically handicapped occupancycategories may not have more than 24 units on one site. As a related matter,the proposed rule would also add definitions of group home (<T3>i.e.,</T3> a single family residential structure designed or adaptedfor occupancy by nonelderly handicapped individuals) and for independentliving complex (<T3>i.e.,</T3> a project designed for occupancy by nonelderly handicappedfamilies in separate dwelling units where each dwelling unit includes akitchen and a bath).Additionally, under the proposed rule HUD may establish a smaller numberof units or residents as a maximum that may be proposed under an application.The limitation would vary from year to year and would be based on the amountof loan fund authority appropriated for the fiscal year. The purpose ofthis requirement is to permit HUD to provide an equitable distributionof the limited number of units that may be funded each year. The annualannouncement of fund availability issued under andSection; 885.705 wouldannounce this limitation.3. <T3>Cost containment and modest design standards.</T3> The proposed rulewould address cost containment and modest design standards at andSection;885.725. In general, this provision codifies basic requirements that havebeen imposed upon section 202/8 applicants in past years. Some of the requirementsreflect statutory provisions that were added by the Housing and Urban RuralRecovery Act of 1983 (1983 Act). The requirements are discussed below.a. <T3>Restrictions on amenities.</T3> Proposed andSection; 885.725(a) containsthe general requirement that housing assisted under Subpart G must be modestin design and that amenities must be limited to those amenities, as determinedby HUD, that are generally provided in unassisted decent, safe, and sanitaryhousing for lower income families in the market area. The proposed sectionlists specific prohibited amenities. (The list is based on HUD Handbook4571.1 REV-2, Paragraph 1-5h.)b. <T3>Unit sizes.</T3> Proposed andSection; 885.725(b) states that HUD willestablish limitations on the size of units (<T3>i.e.,</T3> floor space) and the number of bathrooms that may be includedin various sizes of units in independent living complexes. HUD intendsto continue applying the standards currently in effect (e.g., 415 squarefeet of rentable space and one bathroom in a 0-bedroom unit; 1,150 squarefeet and two bathrooms in a 4-bedroom unit). (These standards are publishedin Handbook 4571-1 Rev. 2.)c. <T3>Special spaces and accommodations. </T3>Section 885.725(c) would limitthe costs of construction of special spaces and accommodations to ten percentof the total cost of construction. This section would also list the spacesand accommodations that are subject to this limitation. These limitationsare based on requirements that have been imposed in recent announcementsof fund availability and in the section 202 handbook.d. <T3>Exceptions. </T3>Section 202(m), as added by the 1983 Act, provides:<ITAG tagnum="21">Nothing in this section authorizes the Secretary to prohibit any Sponsorfrom voluntarily providing funds from other sources for amenities and otherfeatures of appropriate design and construction suitable for inclusionin such project if the cost of such amenities is (1) not financed by theloan and (2) not taken into account in determining the amount of Federalsubsidy or of the rent contribution of tenants.</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 885.725(d)(1) would implement section 202(m). Underthis section, HUD would approve projects with amenities and features thatdo not comply with HUD's cost containment and modest design standards.Such projects will be approved if the Sponsor demonstrates that it is willingand able to contribute the incremental development cost and operating costsassociated with the nonconforming items. To ensure that the additionalcosts are not included in the loan amount or taken into account when determiningthe amount of the Federal subsidy or the rent contribution of the tenants,a mortgage amount limitation would be added at andSection; 885.810(b). Thelimitation would restrict the amount of loan financing to the total developmentcost, less the incremental development cost and capitalized incrementaloperating costs associated with additional amenities and design featuresapproved by HUD under andSection; 885.725(d)(1).Proposed andSection; 885.725(d)(2) would provide an additional exceptionto the cost containment and modest design standards if: The proposed projectinvolves substantial rehabilitation or acquisition with or without moderaterehabilitation; the additional amenities or design features were incorporatedinto the existing structure before the submission of the application; andthe total development cost of the project with the additional amenitiesor design features does not exceed the cost limits described in andSection;885.810.4. <T3>Prohibited facilities. </T3>Section 885.727 would list the facilitiesthat are prohibited in all projects in order to assure that the residentialnature of the housing is maintained. These include commercial spaces, infirmaries,nursing stations, spaces dedicated to the delivery of medical treatmentor physical therapy, padded rooms, or space for respite care or shelteredworkshops. The project facilities may not include office space, exceptfor that to be used exclusively for project administration.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Other Program Requirements </ITAG>1. <T3>Site and neighborhood standards. </T3>The proposed rule at andSection;885.730(a) would state that site and neighborhood standards contained inandSection; 885.206 (a)-(h) and (j) (new construction projects) or andSection;881.206 (a)-(g) and (i) (rehabilitation projects) apply to projects underSubpart G. These site and neighborhood standards are currently appliedto section 202 housing developed under Subparts B through D.The proposed rule would also require that all projects must be locatedin neighborhoods where other family housing is located. Projects may notbe located adjacent to certain facilities (schools or day care centersfor handicapped persons, workshops, medical facilities or other housingprimarily serving handicapped individuals) or in areas where such facilitiesare concentrated. Projects would, however, be permitted to be located adjacentto other housing primarily serving handicapped persons if the projectstogether do not exceed the project size limitations of andSection; 885.720(a).2. <T3>Prohibited relationships. </T3>The existing regulations under SubpartsB through D contain several provisions addressing conflicts of interestand other impermissible relationships. The proposed rule would consolidate,in andSection; 885.735, prohibitions currently contained in the definitionsof Borrower and Sponsor in andSection; 885.5 that state that no officer,director, trustee, member, shareholder or authorized representative ofthe Borrower or officer or director of the Sponsor is permitted to havea financial interest in described contracts; state that no part of thenet earnings of the Sponsor or Borrower may inure to the benefit of anyprivate shareholder, contributor, or individual; and state that the Borrowerand the Sponsor may not be under the direction or control of persons orentities seeking to derive profit or gain from the Borrower or Sponsor.Proposed andSection; 885.735(d) would contain new prohibition stating thata person or an entity (including an affiliated entity) may not provideservices to a project in more than one of the following capacities: Attorney,architect, contractor, housing consultant, management agent or seller ofthe site for the project. The provision, however, would permit a personor an entity to serve as both the management agent and the housing consultant.3. <T3>Other Federal requirements.</T3> Section 885.740 of the proposed rulewould consolidate references to nondiscrimination and equal opportunityrequirements, environmental requirements, requirements regarding floodareas and flood insurance, labor standards, relocation assistance requirements,lead-based paint, and requirements for intergovernmental review. As requiredunder section 162(b)(3) of the Act, the applicability of the Davis-Baconprovisions has been limited to projects designed for dwelling use by 12or more families.The Lead-Based Paint Poisoning Prevention Act (42 U.S.C. 4821-46) (LBPPPAct) does not apply to housing for handicapped families <T3>except</T3> for any dwelling (other than a zero-bedroom dwelling unit)in such housing which was constructed or substantially rehabilitated before1978 and in which any child who is less than seven years of age residesor is expected to reside. Since handicapped families with children mayreside in projects assisted under Subpart G, and since projects other thannew construction may involve housing constructed or substantially rehabilitatedbefore 1978, the proposed rule provides that the requirements of the LBPPPAct and HUD's implementing regulations at 24 CFR Part 35 apply to covereddwellings.In accordance with 24 CFR 35.24(b)(4), the proposed rule imposes proceduresfor the elimination of lead-based paint hazards that supersede the requirementsof 24 CFR Part 35, Subpart C. These requirements reflect the Section 8Existing Housing regulations (24 CFR 882.109) published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on January 15, 1987, (52 FR 1876, 1893-94), asamended on June 6, 1988 (53 FR 20790). The rule includes: Requirementsfor initial inspections of buildings constructed before 1978; abatementof defective paint on applicable surfaces; testing for lead-based painton chewable surfaces where the structure is occupied by a child under theage of seven who has an elevated blood level; tenant protection duringabatement; and recordkeeping requirements.V. Selection of Applications<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Review of Applications for Fund Reservation</ITAG>Section 885.750 would describe the process for the review and selectionof applications for fund reservation. Under the proposed process therewould no longer be an initial screening of applications. Each of the stepsof the process are discussed below.1. <T3>Preliminary evaluation.</T3> The provisions governing the preliminaryevaluation of applications are set forth in proposed andSection;885.750(a).Initially, HUD would determine if the application was received at the appropriateaddress and within the time period specified in the invitation, and iscomplete. Under the section 202/8 regulations (andSection;885.220(b)), applicantssubmitting incomplete applications are given 10 days to provide additionalinformation. While HUD will continue a policy of requesting clarificationsfrom Sponsors when needed to evaluate the application, the Department believesthat it is inappropriate to provide Sponsors with an opportunity followingthe submission of the application to add missing documents to the applicationor otherwise to overcome defects in the original submission.Under the preliminary review, HUD would also screen each application todetermine if it meets the following minimum eligibility requirements:_The Sponsor must be eligible to participate in the program._The proposed facilitites and proposed occupancy requirements must be eligibleunder the program._The application must include a supportive services plan meeting the requirementsset forth in andSection;885.710(b)(6).HUD would notify Sponsors of unapprovable applications following the preliminaryevaluation of all applications.2. <T3>Technical review processing.</T3> Following preliminary review, HUDwould perform a technical review of each application that is found to beacceptable under the preliminary review. HUD would review each applicationto determine whether:_The Sponsor demonstrated financial and management capability to carrythe project through to completion._The Sponsor has previous experience in the development or operation ofhousing, medical, or other facilities, or experience in the provision ofservices to handicapped individuals meeting the project occupany requirements._The Sponsor has made a commitment and will be able to provide preliminarydevelopment costs and the minimum capital investment._The application demonstrates that the proposed housing is appropriatefor handicapped individuals meeting the project occupancy requirements,and indicates that the project is likely to comply with applicable projectstandards, project size limitations, modest design and cost containmentrequirements, and facility prohibitions._The locality (or the site, if the Sponsor submitted site specific evidence)is likely to meet the site and neighborhood standards. If the Sponsor submitssite specific information with its application, HUD would determine ifthe site is acceptable under andSection;885.780 (see discussion below). IfHUD determines the site is unacceptable, however, the application wouldbe processed as if no site specific information was submitted._The Sponsor has submitted a service plan description that is directedto the needs of handicapped individuals meeting the project occupancy requirements,and that demonstrates the Sponsor's ability to provide or assure the provisionof supportive services to such individuals. In reviewing the service plandescription, HUD will invite comments from State agencies serving the proposedoccupancy group._The proposed project does not conflict with State or local plans and policiesgoverning the development and operation of facilities to serve handicappedindividuals._There is evidence of effective demand for the proposed project._The Sponsor is in compliance with nondiscrimination and equal opportunityrequirements._The application is otherwise responsive to the invitation for applicationsand the requirements of Part 885.During technical review processing, HUD would also review any commentsreceived from the State single point of contact and determine if the proposedproject is located in a locality that is acceptable under flood hazardand flood insurance requirements.3. <T3>Ranking.</T3> Section 885.750(c) of the proposed rule provides thatHUD will assign a rating to each application that is found to be approvablefollowing technical review and would rank all applications in order oftheir assigned ratings within each allocation area.In assigning rating points, HUD would assess the extent to which the Sponsorhas demonstrated, relative to other proposals:_Its capacity and commitment to assist the Borrower to carry the projectthrough to long-term operation._Its ability and commitment to provide the financial resources to the Borrowerto establish and ensure the long-term operation of the proposed project._The need in the locality for a project serving handicapped individualsmeeting the proposed project occupancy requirements._Support for the proposed project from the local community, including Stateand local organizations familiar with the needs of handicapped individualsmeeting the proposed project occupancy requirements._The Sponsor's ability to provide or facilitate the provision of proposedsupportive services to handicapped individuals meeting the proposed projectoccupancy requirements.HUD would also assess the degree to which the application supports minorityenterprise, involves a small research or demonstration project, or providesan innovative housing program or alternative method of meeting lower incomehousing need.In order to encourage applicants to obtain site control and to presentsite specific evidence at the earliest possible time, the proposed rulewould permit HUD to assign additional rating points to applications thatinclude satisfactory evidence of an approvable site. If HUD assigns theseadditional rating points, the announcement of fund availability will includethe maximum number of points that will be awarded under this factor.4. <T3>Selection.</T3> Following ranking, HUD would select applications inthe descending order of funding priority that approximates the loan authorityprovided to the allocation area. If the amount of loan authority allocatedto an area exceeds the amount necessary to fund all approvable applications,the Department would transfer the unused loan authority from the area toanother area or area in which there is insufficient loan authority forall approvable applications.After the selection of applications that can be funded with the allocatedloan authority, HUD may select unfunded, but otherwise approvable, applicationsfor funding from available amounts in the Headquarters Reserve. Since thespecial needs factors used in making selections from the Headquarters Reserveunder section 213(d)(4) of the Housing and Community Development Act of1974 include support for the needs of the handicapped, all approvable applicationswould be eligible for funding from the Reserve.Following completion of the selection process, HUD would notify the Sponsorsof applications that are not approvable as a result of technical reviewprocessing and the Sponsors of applications that were approvable but werenot selected for funding. The notification would be in writing and wouldexplain the reasons for HUD's action.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Approval of Applications</ITAG>Under andSection;885.755, a Sponsor whose application is approved would beissued a notice of section 202 fund reservation that states the amountof the loan reservation and the amount of project assistance reserved forthe project. Under the proposed rule, the amount of the loan reservationwould be based on the development cost limit computed under andSection;885.810(c)(see section VI.D.1., below). The amount of project assistance reservedfor the project would be an amount equal to the sum of the operating coststandard applicable to the project (see section VI.B.1., below) plus theannual debt service on the amount of the section 202 loan reservation.The debt service on the amount of the loan reservation would be computedusing the annual rate of interest (described under andSection;885.810(g)(1))in effect on the date that the notice was issued.The notice would also include the number and mix of units approved foran independent living complex (or number of residential spaces approvedfor a group home); the approved project occupancy requirements; the deadlinesfor Sponsor acceptance of the reservation, the submission of site information,the submission of a request for direct loan processing; and other guidance.If the Sponsor did not submit site information with the application, generallythe date for submission of site information will be 60 days from the issuanceof the notice of fund reservation.Proposed andSection; 885.755 would also address the withdrawal of the approvalof the application if the Sponsor does not accept the notification by thespecified date; the transfer of the fund reservation upon the formationof the Borrower; the restriction of use of the fund reservation to theapproved project; and amendments of the fund reservation. <ITAG tagnum="81">C. Duration of Section 202 Fund Reservation</ITAG>1. <T3>Extension and cancellation of fund reservation.</T3> The duration ofthe initial fund reservation under the proposed rule would be 18 months.Under related regulations for the section 202/8 program (see andSection;885.230), the field office, subject to the approval of the Assistant Secretary,is permitted to cancel a fund reservation at any time if it can be establishedthat the Borrower is not making satisfactory progress toward the startof construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition. The field office is requiredto cancel a fund reservation if construction is not begun within 18 monthsafter the issuance of the fund reservation, but may extend this time periodfor up to six additional months. The proposed rule for the section 202 program for housing for handicappedfamilies adopts these cancellation provisions with one revision. HUD hasfound that many Borrowers are not able to start construction, rehabilitationor acquisition within the 24-month period permitted under the related regulationsfor reasons beyond the Department's or the Borrower's control. (For example,such activities are often delayed by litigation involving the Borroweror the Department, by local opposition to a project or by a lack of cooperationfrom local governments.) To ensure that such projects are not prematurelyterminated, the proposed rule adds a provision permitting HUD to extendthe 24 month peroid to up to 36 months. 2.<T3> Notification procedures.</T3> Section 202(n) of the Housing Act of1959 (as added by section 161(e) of the 1987 Act) provides that the Secretaryshall notify the project sponsor not less than 30 days prior to cancellingany loan authority provided under section 202. During the 30-day periodfollowing the receipt of the notice, the Sponsor is permitted to appealthe proposed cancellation of loan authority. The appeal, including reviewby the Secretary, must be completed not later than 45 days after the appealis filed. The proposed rule would add procedures for the appeal of the cancellationof loan authority at andSection; 885.770(b). The rule would provide thatif HUD determines that a fund reservation must be cancelled, the fieldoffice must mail a notice of loan cancellation to the Borrower by certifiedmail, return receipt requested. The notice of cancellation would describethe reasons for the cancellation of the loan authority, would advise theBorrower that it may file an appeal within 30 days of the receipt of thenotice, and would state that failure to file an appeal will result in thecancellation of the fund reservation upon the expiration of the 30-dayperiod. If the Borrower files a timely appeal, HUD headquarters would review theappeal and would issue a decision within 45 days of the receipt of theappeal. The standard for approval of the appeal under this proposed sectionis the same as that prescribed for the extension of the fund reservation(<T3>i.e.,</T3> the Borrower must demonstrate that it is making satisfactoryprogress under an established timetable toward the start of construction,rehabilitation or acquisition with or without substantial rehabilitation).The rule states that HUD would provide a written notification to the Borrowerof its determination on the appeal. If the appeal is granted, the notificationwould include the duration of the extended fund reservation. VI. Direct Loan Processing Procedures<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Site Approval </ITAG>As discussed above, the application would identify the locality in whichthe proposed project will be developed. While Sponsors would be encouragedto provide site information as soon as possible and HUD may offer incentivesto Sponsors that expeditiously provide such information, specific siteinformation would not be <T3>required</T3> until after the issuance of the notice of fund reservation.Site approval must be obtained before the Borrower applies for the conditionalcommitment under andSection; 885.800(c).Section 885.780(a) prescribes the information that must be submitted forsite approval, including: A map showing the location of the site and theracial composition of the neighborhood; evidence of compliance with localzoning ordinances and regulations; information concerning the displacementof site occupants; and evidence of HAP compliance. HUD would review thisinformation to determine whether the site meets the site and neighborhoodstandards of andSection;885.730; the development of the site is permissibleunder applicable zoning ordiances and regulations (or will be permissiblebefore the receipt of the commitment for direct loan financing); and theproposed relocation is feasible and necessary relocation payments willbe funded from sources other than section 202 loan proceeds. In addition,HUD would forward a notification to the chief executive officer of theunit of general government for the purpose of determining whether the proposedsite is approvable under section 213 of the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1974, would conduct an environmental review of the site in accordancewith the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, the related authoritiescited in 24 CFR Part 50 and the Coastal Barriers Resources Act of 1982(16 U.S.C. 3601), and would review the site to ensure that flood hazardand flood insurance requirements are met. Following HUD's review of the site, HUD would issue a notice approvingor disapproving the proposed site. If HUD determines that a site is notapprovable, HUD would notify the Sponsor of the reasons for the disapproval.The Sponsor may, consistent with its application file under andSection; 885.710,obtain a new site and resubmit a request for site approval. <ITAG tagnum="81">B. Request for Direct Loan Processing</ITAG>Following site approval, a Borrower established by the Sponsor must submita request for direct loan processing (including the request for determinationof Borrower eligibility discussed at section III.C.1., above). There aretwo stages to direct loan processing, the conditional commitment and thefirm commitment. 1.<T3> Conditional commitment processing.</T3> During the conditional commitmentstage, HUD would evaluate the request for determination of Borrower's eligibility,would determine the amount of the initial contract rents and any initialutility allowances to be provided in independent living complexes; wouldreview the site and project design; would evaluate the overall financialfeasibility of the project; and would review the Borrower's affirmativefair housing marketing plan. (a) <T3>Initial contract rents and initial utility allowances. </T3>Under andSection;885.800(c)(2),the amount of the initial contract rents plus any utility allowances maynot exceed the reasonable costs of operating a project plus the debt serviceon the amount of the section 202 loan (see section 202(h)(4)(B) of theAct).To estimate the reasonable costs of operating a section 202 project forhandicapped families, the proposed rule at andSection;885.807 provides forthe establishment of operating cost standards. These operating cost standardswould be based on the average annual operating cost of comparable housingfor handicapped families in each field office jurisdiction. The operatingcost standards would be developed for group homes based on the number ofresidents, and for independent living complexes based on the number ofunits. HUD would adjust the operating cost standard applicable to an approvedproject to reflect the additional operating costs necessary to serve handicappedindividuals meeting the project occupancy requirements, and to reflectdifferences in costs based upon project location within the field officejurisdiction. Operating costs included in the standard would be administrativeexpenses (including salary and management expenses related to the provisionof shelter); maintenance expenses (including routine and minor repairsand groundskeeping); security expenses; utility expenses (excluding telephoneservice for families); and allowances for reserves. As required by statute,operating costs do not include the costs of providing or obtaining theprovision of the assured range of services described in the supportiveservice description, such as expenses for administering or managing theprovision of such services.The operating cost standards are used as guidelines to evaluate the reasonablenessof the proposed operating costs of the project. Operating costs for a projectin excess of the operating cost standard (as adjusted) may be approvedif HUD determines that the Borrower has demonstrated that the costs arereasonable and necessary costs of operating the project. Under the proposed rule, HUD would establish utility allowances for independentliving complexes if the cost of utilities (excluding telephones) and otherhousing services are not included in the initial contract rent. The utilityallowance would be based upon the monthly cost of a reasonable consumptionof utilities and other services for the unit by an energy conservativehousehold of modest circumstances, consistent with the requirements ofa safe, sanitary and healthful living environment.The amount of the debt service would be based on the amount of the section202 loan reservation (as computed in accordance with the development costlimits described in andSection;885.810(c)). The rate of interest would bethe optional interest rate (if requested by the Borrower) or the annualinterest rate computed under andSection;885.810(f).(b) <T3>Site and design information. </T3>At the conditional commitment stage,HUD would establish land value, review the site to determine whether theBorrower has site control, and review the project design to determine whetherit will comply with the project standards, the project size limitations,the modest design and cost containment standards, and facility prohibitionsapplicable to the program. To enable HUD to make these determinations,the proposed rule would require the Borrower to submit described informationwith the request for conditional commitment processing.2. <T3>Firm commitment processing. </T3>At the firm commitment stage, HUDwould review final plans and specifications, cost estimates, and HUD'sfindings under the conditional commitment stage. Generally, Borrowers wouldbe required to submit a request for conditional commitment followed bya request for firm commitment. However, HUD may permit the Borrower tosubmit a request for firm commitment without previous conditional commitmentprocessing (e.g., a project involving acquisition with or without rehabilitationor a construction project utilizing a design that has been previously submittedto, and approved by, HUD).<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Approval of Requests for Direct Loan Processing</ITAG>Proposed andSection;885.805 states that HUD would review the request fordirect loan financing (including the request for Borrower eligibility)and notify the Borrower of approval or disapproval. Paragraph (a) describesthe contents of the conditional commitment notification. Paragraph (b)describes the contents of the firm commitment notification.<ITAG tagnum="81">D. Amount of Financing</ITAG>Proposed andSection;885.810 would govern the amount of section 202 loan forhousing for handicapped families. Under paragraph (a) of this section,the amount of financing approved for section 202 housing for handicappedfamilies is limited to the lesser of the estimated development cost andthe development cost limit.1. <T3>Development cost limitations. </T3>Section 202(i)(l) of the HousingAct of 1959 requires HUD, in establishing per unit cost limits for thesection 202 program, to take into account design features necessary tomeet the needs of elderly or handicapped residents, and requires the limitsto reflect the cost of providing those features. The provision also requiresHUD to adjust the unit cost limits to reflect changes in the general levelof construction cost.Section 426 of the 1987 Act increased the per unit mortgage limits forHUD's multifamily mortgage insurance programs, including the limits undersection 221(d)(3) of the National Housing Act. The Conference Report onthe 1987 Act (H. Rep. No. 426, 100th. Cong., 1st Sess. 218 (1987)) expressedthe Conferees' intent that HUD ``raise the mortgage limits for Section202 projects to levels commensurate with the new limits established in[section 426(d)] for Section 221(d)(3)''. On March 18, 1988 (53 FR 8874)HUD published a final rule revising the per unit loan limitations for thesection 202/8 program. In making this revision the Department found thatthe section 221(d)(3) per unit mortgage limits met the requirements ofsection 202(i)(1) of the Act. Today's proposed rule would also establish development cost limitationsfor section 202 independent living complexes for handicapped families basedupon the section 221(d)(3) limits. This development cost limitation wouldapply to the total development cost of the property or project attributableto dwelling use (less the costs associated with excess amenities and designfeatures).The section 221(d)(3) per unit mortgage limits upon which the developmentcost limits for independent living complexes are based were created toreflect the costs of multifamily projects. Group homes, on the other hand,are basically single family residential structures designed or adaptedfor occupancy by nonelderly handicapped individuals. Accordingly, HUD doesnot believe that development cost limits for such projects should be basedon the multifamily project cost limits. Instead, the proposed rule providesthat HUD would periodically establish cost limits for group homes by publishinga notice of the cost limits in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The cost limits would reflect those reasonableand necessary costs of developing a project of the size that will accommodatethe specified number of residents and that would comply with HUD minimumproperty standards, the minimum square footage requirements, the bathroomand recreational area requirements for group homes, cost containment andmodest design standards, and other design requirements applicable to grouphomes under Subpart G. To develop the cost limits for group homes, HUDwould use commercially available cost indices and construction cost datafor recently completed group homes.The proposed rule would permit HUD to adjust the base development costlimit for independent living complexes and group homes. Adjustments include:_The application of high cost percentages that are reviewed annually toassure that the development cost limit will reflect changes in constructioncosts. The high cost area adjustment is limited to an increased of 110percent of the base unit cost in a geographic area, and an increase of140 percent on a project-by-project basis._The application of additional adjustments of up to 50 percent over thehigh cost area adjustment in Alaska, Guam and Hawaii to reflect high constructioncost in these areas.2. <T3>Maximum loan limit. </T3>In addition to the development cost limitsdiscussed above, the proposed rule would limit the amount of the section202 loan to the total estimated development cost of the project as determinedby HUD. If the Borrower will provide excess amenities or design featuresunder andSection; 885.725(d)(1), the incremental development cost and capitalizedoperating costs associated with the excess amenities and design featureswould be subtracted from the total development cost.HUD is concerned that the two limitations on the loan amount would offerBorrowers no incentive to control costs. <T3>I.e.,</T3> without additional requirements, Borrowers would be encouragedto incur total development costs up to the maximum development cost limitdescribed above. Therefore the Department invites comment on ways to encourageBorrowers to contain total development costs to the maximum extent possible.For example, Sponsors might be offered bonus points on future applicationswhen a project is developed for less than the applicable development costlimit. Another alternative might be to permit Borrowers to retain in adevelopment contingency account some portion of the savings when the totaldevelopment cost is less than the development cost limit. Such funds couldbe used only for eligible development purposes as determined by HUD. (Thesepurposes could include such items as the cost of movables necessary tothe basic operation of the project.)3. <T3>Rehabilitation projects and leaseholds.</T3> The proposed rule wouldalso include limitations on the loan amount for rehabilitation projectsand loans secured by a leasehold estate that reflect requirements containedin the related section 202/8 program.<ITAG tagnum="81">E. </ITAG><T3>Terms of the Loan</T3>1. <T3>Loan interest rate.</T3> In addition to provisions addressing housingfor handicapped families, the 1987 Act revised the formula for the calculationof the section 202 loan interest rate, set a ceiling of 9.25 percent onall section 202 loans, and provided the Borrower with an option to haveloan interest rate calculations based on the date that the request forconditional or firm commitment is submitted, rather than on the date thatthe loan is made. (See section 161 of the 1987 Act.) On June 1, 1988 (53FR 19899) HUD published an interim rule in FR-2477 which amended the section202/8 program to incorporate the interest rate provisions. These same provisionsare incorporated in the proposed rule at andSection; 885.810(f) and (g).(Miscellaneous loan interest rate provisions are also contained in andSection;885.800 and 885.805.)2. <T3>Miscellaneous.</T3> The proposed rule at andSection; 885.810 (h) and(i) would adopt the provisions for security for loans and minimum capitalinvestment currently contained in the related section 202/8 program atandSection; 885.410 (i) and (j).<ITAG tagnum="81">F. Other Direct Loan Processing Procedures</ITAG>Subpart G would contain provisions governing: Prepayment of loans and theassignment or transfer of physical or financial assets (andSection; 885.812),requirements prior to initial loan closing (andSection; 885.815), requirementsfor awarding construction contracts (andSection; 885.816), loan disbursementprocedures (andSection; 885.820) and completion of project certification(andSection; 885.825). These provisions would reflect similar provisionsgoverning the related section 202/8 program with the modifications discussedbelow:1. <T3>Requirements for initial loan closing. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.815would prescribe the same requirements for initial loan closing as requiredunder the section 202/8 program (see andSection; 885.415), except that thecontractor and subcontractor certifications concerning labor standards(paragraph (p)) have been deleted since these forms, formerly used in initialclosing, have been eliminated.2. <T3>Requirements for the award of construction contracts.</T3> Under thesection 202/8 program, Borrowers are required to use competitive bidding(formal advertising) in selecting a construction contractor unless thedevelopment cost of the project is less than $2,000,000, the project rentsfall within certain limits, or the Sponsor is a labor organization.Based on its experience under the section 202/8 program, HUD has foundthat the development of smaller projects, including group homes and independentliving complexes, is more economical and expeditious if negotiated, noncompetitivecontracts are allowed for the selection of the contractor. Such contractorsare more likely to be involved in the development of the project in itsearly stages and, thus, are more likely to develop an efficient workingrelationship with all members of the development team and to have a greaterknowledge of project design, which enables them to make accurate constructioncost estimates. Based on HUD's experience, proposed andSection; 885.816 wouldpermit negotiated, noncompetitive construction contracts for all section202 projects for handicapped families.3.<T3> Completion of cost certification.</T3> Section 885.825 contains therequirements for final disbursement of the loan. This proposed sectionsubstantially reflects the related section 202/8 program requirements containedin andSection; 885.415, except for simplified cost certification provisions.Under the proposed rule, HUD would not offer the simplified cost certificationprocedure for projects with mortgages of $500,000 or less. However, HUDwould not require the Borrower's certification of actual cost to be verifiedby an independent public accountant for projects with mortgages of $750,000or less. HUD believes that this procedure will expedite the processingof final requisitions for disbursement of loan proceeds by using uniformprocedures on all loans, and at the same time would save Borrowers thecost of obtaining a verification by an independent public accountant.<T3>VII. Project Assistant Contract and Project Management</T3>Section 162 of the 1987 Act substituted new subsidy payments for the section8 housing assistance payments that were provided in connection with housingfor handicapped families under the section 202 program. HUD is proposingregulations governing the project assistance contract and management requirementsthat are based, to the maximum extent possible, on the section 8 requirementscurrently applicable to section 202/8 projects. HUD believes that thisapproach is appropriate because: (1) The statute requires the continueduse of income eligibility and tenant rent calculations that are in effectin the section 8 program; (2) many Sponsors and Borrowers are familiarwith section 8 requirements; and (3) HUD would like to maintain uniformityin assisted housing programs as much as possible, allowing programmaticdifferences only based on statutory requirements and on the needs of thehandicapped populations served. HUD believes that issues of tenant andmanagement rights and responsibilities and similar cross-cutting aspectsshould be based on consistent rules in all programs that provide rentalassistance.Existing Part 885 does not contain regulations governing project managementor the HAP contract. However, regulations codifying existing contract andmanagement requirements imposed on section 202/8 projects were proposedin FR-1761 on December 9, 1987 (52 FR 46614). Those proposed rules werebased upon the contract and management regulations for section 8 projectsinvolving new construction (24 CFR Part 880) and substantial rehabilitation(24 CFR Part 881). A final rule is pending in FR-1761. To the maximum extentpossible, HUD has used the proposed regulations in FR-1761 as the basisfor the regulations for housing for handicapped families. The section-by-sectiondiscussion below addresses the major provisions of the proposal.<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Project Assistance Contract (PAC) (Sections 885.900 through 885.930)</ITAG>1. <T3>PAC (Section 885.900). </T3>Section 885.900 would provide a generaldescription of the PAC including provisions governing contract execution,effective date, project assistance payments, and utility allowance payments.2. <T3>Term of PAC (Section 885.905).</T3> Section 202(h)(4)(A) provides thatthe term of the contract for assistance shall be 240 months. Accordingly,andSection; 885.905 would limit the term of the PAC to 20 years. If the projectis completed in stages, the term of the PAC for all stages of a projectmay not exceed 22 years.3.<T3> Maximum annual commitment and project account (Section 885.910).</T3>Section 885.910 would govern the maximum annual commitment under the PAC,and the establishment and maintenance of a project account. In accordancewith section 202(h)(4)(A), this proposed rule would provide that the annualcontract amount for any project shall not exceed the total of the initialcontract rents and utility allowances for all assisted units in the project.To ensure that any contract amounts not used by a project in any year shallremain available to the project until the expiration of the contract, asrequired under the statute, andSection; 885.910(b)(1) would require HUD tomaintain a project account established out of the amounts by which themaximum annual commitment exceeds the amount actually paid out under thePAC each year. The statute permits the Secretary to adjust the annual contractamount if the sum of the project income and the amount of assistance paymentsare inadequate to provide for reasonable project costs. In accordance withthese provisions, andSection; 885.910(b)(2) provides ``if the HUD-approvedestimate of required annual payments under the contract for a fiscal yearexceeds the maximum annual commitment for that fiscal year plus the currentbalance in the project account, HUD will within a reasonable time, takesuch steps authorized by section 202(h)(4)(A) as may be necessary to assurethat payments under the PAC will be adequate to cover increases in contractrents and decreases in tenant income.''4.<T3> Leasing to eligible families (Section 885.915).</T3> Section 202(h)(4)(C)provides that the Secretary shall require that, during the term of eachPAC, all units in a project must be made available for occupancy by lowerincome families, as such term is defined in section 3(b)(2) of the UnitedStates Housing Act of 1937.Section 885.915 would implement this requirement. This section would requirethe Borrower to make available for occupancy by eligible families the totalnumber of units (or residential spaces in group homes) for which assistanceis provided under the PAC. If the Borrower is temporarily unable to leaseall assisted units (or residential spaces in a group home) to familiesthat are eligible to occupy them, one or more units (or residential spaces)may, with the prior approval of HUD, be leased to ``ineligible'' families(<T3>e.g.,</T3> to handicapped families that cannot meet the income eligibilityrequirements under section 3(b)(2) of the United States Housing Act of1937). In addition to other sanctions that may be imposed on the Borrowerfor failure to lease to eligible families, the proposed rule would authorizeHUD to reduce the number of assisted units (or residential spaces) if theBorrower fails to comply with these requirements or if HUD determines thatthe inability to lease to eligible families is not a temporary problem.The proposed rule would permit the restoration of any reduction, understated circumstances.In addition to the income eligibility requirements applicable to section202 housing for handicapped families, families occupying assisted or unassistedunits (or residential spaces in group homes) in projects must meet thedefinition of handicapped family (see andSection; 885.5). In recognitionof situations where there may be an insufficient number of handicappedfamilies requesting admission to the project to ensure the maintenanceof solvent operations, the proposed regulation would permit HUD to relievethe Borrower of the requirement that all units in the project (or residentialspaces in the group home) must be leased to handicapped families if: (1)The Borrower has made reasonable efforts to lease assisted and unassistedunits (or residential spaces) to eligible families; (2) the Borrower hasbeen granted HUD approval under paragraph (a) of this section for all unoccupied,assisted units (or residential spaces); and (3) the Borrower is temporarilyunable to achieve or maintain a level of occupancy sufficient to preventfinancial default and foreclosure under the section 202 loan documents.HUD approval under this paragraph would be of limited duration. HUD mayimpose terms and conditions on this approval that are consistent with theprogram's objectives or necessary to protect HUD's interest in the section202 loan. Such terms and conditions may include limiting the terms of leasesto nonhandicapped families to one year or less and requiring the Borrowerto replace these families at the end of their lease term with eligiblehandicapped applicants for admission to the project. HUD believes thatpermitting a suspension of the eligibility requirement might be essentialto preserving the project for the benefit of the present eligible tenants,as well as for occupancy by future eligible families.To prevent abuses in the determination of eligibility of families and toensure necessary supervision, HUD will handle each suspension on an individualbasis, rather than by built-in exceptions to the project occupancy criteriastated in the regulations. Similarly, HUD will limit the duration and scopeof each suspension to the narrowest extent possible to achieve needed occupancyand will impose other terms and conditions that are consistent with theprogram objectives and are necessary to protect HUD's interest in the loan.5. <T3>PAC administration (Section 885.920).</T3> Section 885.920 would providethat HUD is responsible for the administration of the PAC.6. <T3>Default (Section 885.925).</T3> Section 885.925(a) would provide thatif the Borrower is in default under the PAC, HUD will notify the Borrowerof the actions necessary to cure the default and of the remedies to beapplied by HUD. If the Borrower fails to cure the default, HUD would havethe right to terminate the PAC or take other corrective action. In addition,paragraph (b) of andSection; 885.925 would notify Borrowers that additionalprovisions governing default under the section 202 loan, rather than thePAC, are included in the regulatory agreement and other loan documents(<T3>e.g.,</T3> the note and first mortgage or deed of trust).7. <T3>Notice upon PAC expiration (Section 885.930).</T3> While Section 202does not require the Borrower to notify the families of rent increasesthat may occur as a result of the contract's expiration (compare section8(c)(8) of the United States Housing Act of 1937), the proposed rule wouldadministratively impose this same requirement on Borrowers. The proposedrule would require that the PAC provide that the Borrower will, at least90 days before the end of the PAC contract term, notify each family occupyingan assisted unit (or residential space in a group home) of any increasein the amount that the family would be required to pay as a result of theexpiration. The notice of expiration would contain such information andwould be served in such a manner as HUD may prescribe.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Management provisions (Sections 885.940 through 985)</ITAG>1.<T3> Responsibilities of borrower (Section 885.940). </T3>Section 885.940would describe the Borrower's marketing, management, maintenance, and fiscalresponsibilities regarding the project. Under paragraph (a), the Borrower'smarketing activities would include: (1) The commencement of diligent marketingactivities for 90 days before the date of availability for occupancy ofthe group home or the first unit in an independent living complex; (2)marketing in accordance with the HUD-approved affirmative fair housingmarketing plan and all fair housing and equal opportunity requirements;and (3) the submission to HUD of a list of leased and unleased assistedunits (or, in the case of a group home, leased and unleased residentialspaces) on the date of PAC execution.Paragraph (b) would provide that the Borrower is responsible for all managementfunctions including tenant selection and the admission of tenants, reexaminationof incomes of families occupying assisted units or residential spaces,collection of rents, termination of tenancy, eviction, and repair and maintenancefunctions.Paragraph (c)(1) would permit the Borrower to contract with a public orprivate entity for the performance of marketing, management and maintenanceduties. The proposed rule would subject all such contracts to the provisionsgoverning prohibited contractual relationships that were added in the interimrule amending andSection; 885.5, published April 10, 1986 (51 FR 12308).These prohibitions do not extend to management contracts entered into bythe Borrower with the Sponsor or its nonprofit affiliate. Paragraph (c)(2)would require the Borrower to promote awareness and participation of minorityand women's business enterprises in contracting and procurement activities,consistent with objectives of Executive Orders 11625, 12432 and 12138.Section 885.940(d) would provide for the submission of audited financialand operating statements by the Borrower 60 days after the end of eachfiscal year of project operations and other financial statements as HUDmay require. These financial statements must be audited by an independentpublic accountant.  Under paragraph (e), the Borrower would be required to maintain a projectfund account in HUD-approved depository and to deposit all rents, charges,income and revenue arising from project operation or ownership to thisaccount. Project funds would be used for the operation of the project,to make required principal and interest payments on the Section 202 loan,and to make required deposits on the replacement reserve account in accordancewith a HUD-approved budget. All funds remaining in the account after theend of fiscal year would be deposited in the replacement reserve accountunder andSection;885.945.  Paragraph (f) would require the Borrower to submit such reports as HUDmay prescribe to demonstrate conformance with applicable civil rights andequal opportunity requirements.  2. <T3>Replacement reserve (Section 885.945). </T3>Section 885.945 would requirethe Borrower to establish and maintain a replacement reserve to aid infunding extraordinary repair and replacement of capital items. The Borrowerwould be required to make monthly deposits in the reserve. The amount ofthe deposits for the initial year of operations would be 0.6 percent ofthe cost of total structures (for new construction projects), 0.4 percentof the initial mortgage amount (for other projects), or such higher ratesas may be required by HUD. This section proposes to adjust the amount ofthe deposit each year by the appropriate annual adjustment factor underPart 888; the Department invites comment on application of this factoror recommendations for more suitable methods of adjusting the amount ofthe reserve. All earnings on the account would be added to the balanceof the account. Under existing HUD policies, the replacement reserve mustbe held in a HUD-approved depository in an interest-bearing account. Theproposed rule would amend this practice to permit the Borrower to depositthe funds with HUD or in a HUD-approved depository. Consistent with existingpractice, replacement reserve funds would be used only with the approvalof HUD and in accordance with HUD guidelines. The proposed rule would providethat HUD may reduce the rate of deposit to the account if it finds thatthe reserve is sufficient to meet projected extraordinary maintenance andcapital replacement needs.  3. <T3>Selection and admission of tenants (Section 885.950 (a) and (b)). </T3>Requirementsgoverning the selection and admission of tenants are described in the proposedrule at andSection;885.950(a) and (b). To initiate the tenant selection process,an applicant for admission would be required to complete and sign an applicationfor admission. Applicants for an assisted unit or residential space wouldbe required, as part of the application, to complete a certification ofeligibility (<T3>i.e., </T3>Owner's Certification of Compliance with HUD's Tenant Eligibilityand Rent Procedures_HUD-50059).  Housing for handicapped families means housing and related facilities tobe occupied by handicapped families who are primarily nonelderly handicappedfamilies. Accordingly, in order to be eligible for admission to housingassisted under Subpart G, the applicant-family must meet the definitionof handicapped family currently included in the regulations at andSection;885.5.The fact that an applicant meets this definition, however, does not meanthat the applicant is eligible for occupancy in each section 202 housingproject for handicapped families. As noted above, section 202 housing forhandicapped families may limit project occupancy to one or more specificeligible populations. These eligible populations include the chronicallymentally ill, the developmentally disabled, or the physically handicappedor combination of such populations. Accordingly, andSection;885.950(b) ofthe proposed rule would provide that to be eligible for admission the applicant-familymust be a handicapped family as described under andSection;885.5 and mustmeet the HUD-approved project occupancy requirements submitted at the timeof application for loan reservation. (As a related matter, the definitionof handicapped person would be amended to reflect a revised definitionof developmentally disabled individual as defined under section 102(a)(7)of the Developmental Disabilities Services and Facilities ConstructionAmendments of 1970_as required under section 170(g) of the 1987 Act, andto add a new definition of ``chronically mentally ill''.)  In addition to these requirements, section 202(h)(4)(C) provides that duringthe term of each PAC, all units in the project must be made available foroccupancy by lower income families, as that term is defined in section3(b)(2) of the United States Housing Act of 1937. In accordance with thisprovision, andSection;885.950(b) would require that the applicant-familymust be eligible for admission under the income eligibility standards ofandSection;813.103. Related definitions for ``annual income'', ``contractrent'', ``gross rent'', ``rent'', ``tenant rent'', ``total tenant payment'',``utility allowance'', and ``utility reimbursement'' would be added toandSection;885.5. With the exception of ``annual income'', all of these definitionswould incorporate the definitions contained in Part 813. The definitionof annual income would incorporate the Part 813 definition with the additionallanguage implementing section 202(h)(4)(C). This section provides thatthe gross income of a family occupying an intermediate care facility assistedunder title XIX of the Social Security Act shall be the same amount asif the family were being assisted under title XVI of the Social SecurityAct. HUD invites comment on other issues related to income determinationthat may apply exclusively to the occupancy groups in housing under thissubpart, <T3>e.g., </T3>issues involving State supplementary allowances or specialpractices in disbursement of payments under the Social Security Act.  In addition to the admission requirements governing handicap and income,Borrowers under the section 202 program for handicapped families wouldbe permitted to develop and implement additional family selection criteria.For example, an owner could find an otherwise eligible applicant to be``unsuitable'' if the applicant is unable to live independently in theproject without support services that he or she needed but which are notavailable. Accordingly, andSection;885.950(b) also provides that the Borroweris reponsible for the selection of families.  The proposed rule also addresses (1) local residency requirements and preferences,(2) procedures for assignment of available units or residential spacesand provisions for waiting lists, (3) procedures for rejecting applicantsand for informal review of rejections, and (4) records maintenance.  4. <T3>Reexamination of family income and composition (Section 885.950(c)).</T3>Provisions governing the reexamination of family income and compositionare included at andSection;885.950(c). Under the proposed rule, if the Borrowerreceives project assistance payments for a family, the Borrower would berequired to examine and verify income and family composition at least onceevery 12 months; make appropriate adjustments to total tenant payment,tenant rent and the project assistance payments; and make appropriate unittransfers. This provision also would require assisted families to complywith lease provisions governing interim reporting of income changes. Whena Borrower receives information between regularly scheduled reexaminations,the proposed rule requires the Borrower to consult with the family, verifycertain information and make appropriate adjustments, as discussed above. The proposed rule also provides that a family's eligibility for projectassistance payments continues until the total tenant payment equals orexceeds gross rent (or pro rata share of the gross rent in a group home).The termination of project assistance payments, however, would not affectthe family's rights under the lease or preclude the resumption of paymentsif, as a result of later changes, the family again were to meet the incomeeligibility requirements, and if project assistance for the family's unitor residential space was available under the PAC. To be eligible for resumedpayments, a family would not be required to reestablish its eligibilityfor occupancy under other tenant selection criteria. Termination of assistancein accordance with other HUD requirements such as failure to submit requestedverification information is treated at proposed andSection;885.950(c)(3)(ii). 5. <T3>Obligations of the family (Section 885.955). </T3>To ensure that themajor obligations of the families occupying projects for handicapped familiesare addressed, the proposed rule would add andSection;885.955. This sectionwould require the family to (1) pay amounts due under the lease directlyto the Borrower; (2) provide necessary certifications, releases, informationor documentation as HUD or the Borrower determine to be necessary; (3)permit the Borrower to conduct reasonable inspections; and (4) notify theBorrower before vacating the dwelling unit or residential space. The sectionwould also contain restrictions on the use of the unit or residential spaceand on transfer of the unit or residential space and the assigment of thelease, and would prohibit the family from receiving assistance under anyother Federal housing assistance program while occupying, or receivingassistance for the occupancy of, a unit or residential space governed byPart 885.  6. <T3>Overcrowded and underoccupied units (Section 885.960). </T3>Section885.960 would provide that the Borrower is responsible for determiningwhether an assisted unit is overcrowded or underoccupied. If the Borrowermakes such a determination, the project assistance payments would not bereduced or terminated until the family is relocated. (Vacancy paymentsfor the vacated unit would be governed by andSection;885.985.)  7. <T3>Lease requirements (Section 885.965). </T3>Section 885.965 of the proposedrule provides that the initial term of the lease must be for at least oneyear. Occupancy limited by transitional programs is not permitted. Unlessthe lease has been terminated by appropriate action by the Borrower orfamily, upon expiration of the lease term the family and the Borrower mayexecute a new lease for a term of at least one year, or may take no action,If no action is taken, the lease would automatically be renewed for successiveterms of one month. Under this proposed section, all leases may contain(and in the case of a lease term for more than one year must contain) aprovision permitting the family to terminate on 30 days' notice. The formof the lease would be prescribed in a HUD handbook. In addition to therequired provisions in the handbook, this section would permit the Borrowerto include a lease provision permitting the Borrower to enter the leasedpremises at any time without advance notice where there is reasonable groundto belive that an emergency exists or that the health or safety of a familymember is endangered.8. <T3>Termination of tenancy and modification of lease (Section 885.970).</T3>Subpart A of 24 CFR Part 247_Evictions from Certain Subsidized andHUD-owned Projects, applies to all decisions by a landlord to terminatethe occupancy of tenants in a subsidized project and prescribes proceduresfor modification of leases. As defined in andSection;247.2(e), ``subsidizedproject'' includes a multifamily housing project which receives the benefitof a subsidy in the form of direct loans under section 202. Proposed andSection;885.970would apply the Part 247 provisions to section 202 projects for handicappedfamilies.  9. <T3>Security deposits (Section 885.972). </T3>Provisions governing securitydeposits would be covered at andSection;885.972. Under the proposed rule,the Borrower: (1) Must require each family occupying an assisted unit orresidential space to pay a security deposit equal to the greater of $50or one month's total tenant payment, and (2) may require each family occupyingan unassisted unit or residential space to pay a security deposit equalto one month's rent payable by the family. The family would be expectedto pay the security deposit from its own resources and other availablepublic or private resources.  The Borrower would be required to place all security deposits in a segregatedinterest-bearing account and would be required to maintain a record ofthe amount in this account that is attributable to each family in residencein the project. Interest accrued would be allocated to each family's balanceannually and at the time the family vacates the unit or residential space.Unless prohibited under State or local law, the Borrower would be permittedto deduct the administrative cost of computing each family's allocationup to the amount of the family's annual accrued interest. The amount inthe segregated interest-bearing account must at all times be equal to thetotal amount collected from families in occupancy, plus accrued interest,less allowable adminstrative cost adjustments. The Borrower would alsobe required to comply with applicable State and local law concerning interestpayments on security deposits.  The Borrower would be permitted to use the security deposit as reimbursementfor any unpaid family contribution and other amounts that the family owesunder the lease. If the family owes no amounts under the lease, the proposedrule would require the Borrower to refund the security deposit balanceto the family. If the family owes amounts under the lease and the amountis less than the security deposit balance, the excess balance would beremitted to the family. If the security deposit balance is not sufficientto reimburse the Borrower for the amount owed under the lease of an assistedunit or residential space, andSection;885.972 would permit the Borrower toclaim reimbursement from HUD for the lesser of the amount owed, or onemonth's contract rent less the amount of the family's security depositbalance.  The proposed rule would required the Borrower to provide itemized statementsof security deposit disbursement and other documents; would require thefamily to provide forwarding addresses or to arrange for refund pick up;and would provide for informal meetings to resolve security deposit disagreementsbetween the parties. Additionally, the proposed rule would provide thatupon the death of a member of a family, the decedent's interest, if any,in the security deposit would be governed by State or local law.  As noted above, the security deposit provision would contain numerous referencesto State or local law. For example, the Borrower would be required to complywith applicable State and local law governing the payment of interest onsecurity deposits (andSection;885.972(b)(1)). The intent of these provisionsis to ensure that the law which is most protective of the family's interestwill be applied.  10. <T3>Adjustment of rents (Section 885.975). </T3>To ensure that the contractrents continue to reflect the total actual necessary and reasonable costsof developing and operating the project (see section 202(h)(4)(B)), andSection;885.975(a)provides for the adjustment of contract rents. The proposed rule providesthat HUD would compute the contract rent adjustment based on the sum ofthe budgeted project operating costs and debt service with adjustmentsfor vacancies, for the project's non-rental income and for other factorsHUD determines to be appropriate.  (It should be noted that one of the items used in the computation of theHUD-approved budget will be affected by the annual adjustment factor forthe section 8 program. As provided in andSection;885.945, the amount of theannual deposit for the replacement reserve for all projects is adjustedbased on the automatic adjustment factor.)  Paragraph (b) of this section would provide that during the term of thePAC the rent payable by families occupying units or residential spacesthat are not assisted under the contract will be equal to the contractrent computed under paragraph (a). This paragraph reflects HUD's existingpolicy with regard to such rents and is necessary to prevent the subsidizationof unassisted units by assisted units and <T3>vice versa.  </T3>11. <T3>Adjustment of utility allowances (Section 885.980). </T3>Section 885.980addresses the adjustment of utility allowances for assisted units in independentliving complexes. This provision would state that, in connection with contractrent adjustments under andSection;885.975(a), the Borrower must submit ananalysis of the project's utility rate. If a change would result in a cumulativeincrease of 10 percent or more in the most recently approved utility allowance,the Borrower would be required to advise HUD and request approval of newutility allowances for assisted units. The Borrower would also be requiredto notify families of the adjustment and to make a corresponding adjustmentof tenant rent and the project assistance payment for the assisted unit. 12. <T3>Vacancy payments (Section 885.985). </T3>Section 885.985 would prescribethe conditions for the receipt of vacancy payments under the PAC. Thissection generally would provide for vacancy payments in the amount of 80percent of contract rents for the first 60 days of vacancy during or afterrent-up. For vacancies longer than 60 days, the Borrower could receiveadditional vacancy payments in an amount equal to the principal and interestpayments required to amortize the portion of the debt service attributableto the vacant unit or residential space for up to 12 months. Conditionsgoverning the receipt of vacancy payments would vary depending on whetherthe vacancy began during or after rent-up and whether it continues forlonger than 60 days.VIII. Other Matters  In addition to the provisions discussed above, the proposed rule wouldrevise Part 813 to reflect the addition of the project assistance paymentsprovisions, and would add various new definitions to Part 885 to reflectthe requirements of the section 202 program for handicapped families.IX. Findings and Certifications  A finding of No Significant Impact with respect to the environment hasbeen made in accordance with HUD regulations at 24 CFR Part 50, which implementsection 102(2)(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969. TheFinding of No Significant Impact is available for public inspection duringregular business hours in the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk, Officeof the General Counsel, Department of Housing and Urban Development, Room10276, 451 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20410-0500.This rule does not constitute a ``major rule'' as that term is definedin section 1(d) of the Executive Order on Federal Regulations issued bythe President on February 17, 1981. An analysis of the rule indicates thatit does not: (1) Have an annual effect on the economy of $100 million ormore; (2) cause a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individualindustries, Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographicregions; or (3) have a significant adverse effect on competition, employment,investment, productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-basedenterprises to compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or exportmarkets. In accordance with 5 U.S.C. 605(b) (the Regulatory Flexibility Act), theundersigned hereby certifies that this rule does not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. This rule doesnot affect the amount of funds available under the section 202 program.Rather, the rule modifies and updates the program requirements to implementrecent statutory revisions designed to ensure that the program will meetthe special housing and related needs of nonelderly handicapped families.While the rule will modify the subsidy mechanism and the development proceduresfor the section 202 program, HUD does not believe that the economic impacton small entities will be substantial. This rule was listed as item 920 in the Department's Semiannual Agendaof Regulations published on April 25, 1988 (53 FR 13854, 13872) under ExecutiveOrder 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act. The Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance program number is 14.157, Housingfor the Elderly or Handicapped. The collection of information requirements contained in this rule havebeen submitted to the Office of Management and Budget for review undersection 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. The sections ofthe proposed rule identified in the matrix below have been determined bythe Department to contain collection of information requirements. Informationon these requirements is provided as follows: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Tabulation of Annual Reporting Burden,\1\ Proposed Rule_Section</T4>202<T4> Projects for Nonelderly Handicapped Families</T4><H1>Description of information collection</H1><H1>Section of 24 CFR affected</H1><H1>Number of respondents</H1><H1>Number of responses per respondent</H1><H1>Total annual responses</H1><H1>Hours per response</H1><H1>Total hours</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Application submission requirements, initial loan closing requirements(2502-0267)<D>885.710, 885.815</D><D>450</D><D>1</D><D>450</D><D>26.7</D><D>12,015.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Affirmative Fair Housing marketing requirements (2502-0267)<D>885.740(a)(6)</D><D>450</D><D>1</D><D>450</D><D>(</D>andCx.30;)<D>(</D>andCx.30;)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fair Housing advertising and poster guidelines (2502-0267)<D>(a)(7)</D><D>450</D><D>1</D><D>450</D><D>(</D>andCx.30;)<D>(</D>andCx.30;)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Davis-Bacon Labor Standards (2502-0267)<D>(d)</D><D>450</D><D>1</D><D>450</D><D>(</D>andCx.30;)<D>(</D>andCx.30;)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Relocation assistance (2502-0267)<D>(e)</D><D>450</D><D>1</D><D>450</D><D>(</D>andCx.30;)<D>(</D>andCx.30;)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inspection for lead-based paint hazards<D>(f)</D><D>10</D><D>1</D><D>10</D><D>2</D><D>20.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Borrower's appeal of loan cancellation (2502-0267)<D>885.770(b)(2)</D><D>10</D><D>1</D><D>10</D><D>(</D>andCx.30;)<D>(</D>andCx.30;)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request to substitute Subpt. G project assistance payments for Sec.8 assistance payments<D>885.775</D><D>10</D><D>1</D><D>10</D><D>1</D><D>1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Site information (2502-0267)<D>885.780</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>(</D>andCx.30;)<D>(</D>andCx.30;)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request for direct loan processing (2502-0267)<D>885.800</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>11.2</D><D>2,240.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request for loan disbursement (2502-0187)<D>885.820</D><D>200</D><D>12</D><D>2,400</D><D>.5</D><D>1,200.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cost certification (2502-0044)<D>885.825</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>56</D><D>11,200.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Project Assistance Contract<D>885.900</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>5</D><D>1,000.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Leasing to eligible families (2502-0371)<D>885.915</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>.1</D><D>20.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notice upon PAC expiration <D>885.930</D><D>0</D><D>\2\ 1</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">FHEO marketing plan and requirements (2502-0371)<D>885.940(a)(2)</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>.75</D><D>150.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">List of leased and unleased units; justification for latter (2502-0371)<D>(a)(3)</D><D>200</D><D>12</D><D>2,400</D><D>.25</D><D>600.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HUD approval of contracting for services (2502-0371)<D>(c)(1)</D><D>50</D><D>1</D><D>50</D><D>1</D><D>50.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Borrower's promotion of minority and women's business enterprises (2502-0371)<D>(c)(2)</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Audited financial statements (2502-0371)<D>(d)</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>2</D><D>400.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maintenance of records of racial, ethnic, gender and place of previousresidency data (2502-0371)<D>(f)</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>.25</D><D>50.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Administration of reserve (2502-0371)<D>885.945(d)</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>.5</D><D>100.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Application for admission (2502-0371)<D>885.950(a)</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>3,600</D><D>.25</D><D>900.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Waiting list (2502-0371)<D>885.950(b)(2)</D><D>200</D><D>12</D><D>2,400</D><D>.25</D><D>600.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notification of rejection due to ineligibility; review if appealed(2502-0371)<D>(b)(3)</D><D>50</D><D>1</D><D>50</D><D>.25</D><D>12.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Re-examination of family income and composition (2502-0371)<D>(c)</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>3,600</D><D>.25</D><D>900.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obligation of family (2502-0371)<D>885.955</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>3,600</D><D>.1</D><D>360.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lease requirements (2502-0371)<D>885.965</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>3,600</D><D>.1</D><D>360.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Security deposits (2502-0371)<D>885.972</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>3,600</D><D>.1</D><D>360.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Justification for rent Adjustments (2502-0371)<D>885.975</D><D>20</D><D>1</D><D>20</D><D>2</D><D>40.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Analysis of utility cost increases (2502-0371)<D>885.980</D><D>200</D><D>1</D><D>200</D><D>2</D><D>400.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Conditions for receipt of vacancy payments (2502-0371)<D>885.985</D><D>10</D><D>1</D><D>10</D><D>.5</D><D>5.0</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Annual Burden<D/><D/><D/><D/><D/><D>33,182.5</D><F>\1\ The annual reporting burden itemized for OMB clearance numbers 2502-0267,2502-0187, 2502-0044 and 2502-0371 on this table was included in the calculationof annual burden at the most recent approval of each, and therefore doesnot represent an increase in the Office of Housing information collectioninventory.</F><F>\2\ Not necessary until end of 20-year contract.</F><F/>andCx.30; The burden hours for these items are included under applicationsubmission requirements.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>24 CFR Part 813Low- and moderate-income housing. 24 CFR Part 885Aged, Grant programs, Housing and community development, Handicapped, Loanprograms: housing and community development, Low- and moderate-income housing.For the reasons set forth in the preamble, Title 24 of the Code of FederalRegulations Parts 813 and 885 would be amended to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 813_DEFINITION OF INCOME, INCOME LIMITS, RENT AND REEXAMINATIONOF FAMILY INCOME FOR THE SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAMSAND RELATED PROGRAMS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 813 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5(b), 8 and 16, United States Housing Actof 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437f and 1437n); sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>2. Section 813.101 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and applicability. </ITAG>This part establishes definitions, policies and procedures related to incomelimits and the determination of eligibility, income and rent for applicantsand tenants in housing assisted under section 8 of the United States HousingAct of 1937 (``the 1937 Act''). However, andSection; 813.107 and the definitionsof Gross Rent, Tenant Rent, Total Tenant Payment, Utility Allowance andUtility Reimbursement found in andSection; 813.102 do not apply to familiesassisted under the Housing Voucher Program (24 CFR Part 887). The definitions,policies and procedures also apply to projects that are assisted with loansunder section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 and that receive housing assistancepayments under section 8 of the 1937 Act (see 24 CFR Part 885, SubpartsB through D) or project assistance payments under section 202(h) of theHousing Act of 1959 (see 24 CFR Part 885, Subpart G). (See 24 CFR Part913 for the analogous rule applicable to the Public Housing and IndianHousing Programs.) 3. In andSection; 813.102, the definitions of owner and utility allowancewould be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Owner. </T3>The meaning ascribed to such term in the pertinent programregulations. As used in this Part, where appropriate, Owner shall alsoinclude a Borrower as defined in 24 CFR Part 885. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Utility Allowance. </T3>If the cost of utilities (except telephone)and other housing services for an assisted unit is not included in theContract Rent but is the responsibility of the Family occupying the unit,an amount equal to the estimate made or approved by a PHA or HUD underapplicable sections of these regulations (see 24 CFR Parts 880, 881, 882,883, 884, 885, and 886) of the monthly costs of reasonable consumptionof such utilities and other services for the unit by an energy-conservativehousehold of modest circumstances consistent with the requirements of asafe, sanitary, and healthful living environment. (In the case of sharedhousing, the amount of the Utility Allowance for an assisted Family iscalculated by multiplying the Utility Allowance for the entire unit bythe ratio derived by dividing the number of bedrooms in the Assisted Family'sprivate space by the number of bedrooms in the entire unit. In the caseof an assisted individual sharing a one-bedroom unit with another person,the amount of the Utility Allowance for the assisted individual is one-halfof the Utility Allowance for the entire unit. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>4. Section 813.109(a) would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial determination, verification, and reexamination of Family incomeand composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Responsibility for initial determination and reexamination. </T3>TheOwner of PHA shall be responsible for determination of eligibility foradmission, for determination of Annual Income, Adjusted Income and TotalTenant Payment, and for reexamination of Family income and compositionat least annually, as provided in pertinent program regulations and handbooks(see, <T3>e.g.</T3>, Part 880, Subpart F and Part 881, Subpart F, which, forthe purposes of this part shall also apply, as appropriate, to projectsdeveloped under Part 885, Subparts B through D; Part 882, Subparts B andE; Part 883, Subpart G; Part 884, Subpart B; Part 885, Subpart G; Part886, Subparts A and C; and Part 887, Subpart H). As used in this part,the ``effective date'' of an examination or reexamination refers: (1) In the case of examination for admission, to the effective date ofinitial occupancy; and (2) In the case of a reexamination of an existing tenant, to the effectivedate of the redetermined housing assistance payment with respect to theHousing Voucher Program (Part 887) and the effective date of the redeterminedTotal Tenant Payment for all programs. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 885_LOANS FOR HOUSING FOR THE ELDERLY OR HANDICAPPED </ITAG>5. The authority citation for Part 885 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 202, Housing Act of 1959 (12 U.S.C. 1701q); sec.8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437f); sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>6. Section 885.1 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and policy. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose. </T3>The program under this part provides direct Federal loansunder section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 (42 U.S.C. 1701g) for housingprojects serving elderly or handicapped families and project assistancepayments for projects serving nonelderly handicapped families. The housingprojects shall provide the necessary services for the occupants, whichmay include, but are not limited to: Health, continuing education, welfare,informational, recreational, homemaking, counseling, and referral services,as well as transportation where necessary to facilitate access to theseservices. (b) <T3>General policy. </T3>A loan made under this part shall be used to financethe construction or the substantial rehabilitation of projects for elderlyor handicapped families, or for the acquisition, with or without moderaterehabilitation, of existing housing and related facilities for group homesfor nonelderly handicapped individuals. (c) <T3>Applicability. </T3>(1) Subparts B through D of this part apply toprojects for elderly or handicapped families that receive loans under section202 of the Housing Act of 1959 and housing assistance payments under section8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937. No project for handicapped(primarily nonelderly) families is eligible for loans or housing assistancepayments under Parts B through D, except under a reservation of loan andcontract authority made before (<T3>insert effective date of final rule</T3>). (2) Subpart G of this part applies to projects for nonelderly handicappedfamilies receiving loans under section 202 and project assistance paymentsunder section 202(h) of the Housing Act of 1959. Subpart G may also applyto projects for handicapped families that received a reservation of loanauthority under Subparts B through D under the circumstances describedin andSection; 885.775. 7. In andSection; 885.5, the definition of ``Elderly or Handicapped Families''would be removed, the definitions of ``Application'' and ``HandicappedPerson'' would be revised and definitions for ``Agreement to Enter intoProject Assistance Contract'', ``Annual Income'', ``Assisted Unit'', ``ContractRent'', ``Elderly Family'', ``Family'', ``Gross Rent'', ``Group Home'',``Handicapped Family'', ``Housing for Handicapped Families'', ``IndependentLiving Complex'', ``Independent Public Accountant'', ``Nonelderly HandicappedFamilies'', ``Project Account'', ``PAC'', ``Project Assistance Payment'',``Rent'', ``Tenant Rent'', ``Total Tenant Payment'', ``Utility Allowance'',``Utility Reimbursement'', and ``Vacancy Payment'' would be added, in alphabeticalorder, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="89">andSection; 885.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Agreement to enter into project assistance contract </T3>means theagreement between the Borrower and HUD which provides that, upon satisfactorycompletion of the project, HUD will enter into the PAC with the Borrower.<T3>Annual income </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter. In the caseof an individual residing in an intermediate care facility for the mentallyretarded that is assisted under Title XIX of the Social Security Act andthis part, the annual income of the individual shall exclude protectedpersonal income as provided under that Act. For the purposes of determiningthe total tenant payment, the income of such individuals shall be imputedto be the amount that the family would receive if assisted under TitleXVI of the Social Security Act. <T3>Application </T3>means the application for a section 202 fund reservation,including all required forms and exhibits submitted in response to an invitationfor such applications, or a request for admission to a project made bya family on a form prescribed by HUD. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Assisted unit </T3>means a dwelling unit that is eligible for assistanceunder a PAC. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Contract rent </T3>means the total amount of rent specified in thePAC as payable by HUD and the family to the Borrower for an assisted unitor residential space. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Elderly family </T3>means: (a) Families of two or more persons the head of which (or his or her spouse)is sixty-two years of age or older; (b) The surviving member or members of any family described in paragraph(a) living in a unit assisted under this part with the deceased memberof the family at the time of his or her death; (c) A single person who is sixty-two years of age or older; or (d) Two or more elderly persons living together, or one or more such personsliving with another person who is determined by HUD, based upon a licensedphysician's certificate provided by the family, to be essential to theircare or well being. <T3>Family (eligible family) </T3>means an elderly family or a handicappedfamily (as defined in this section) that meets the project occupancy requirementsapproved by HUD and, if the family occupies an assisted unit, meets thelower-income requirements described in andSection; 813.102 of this chapter,as modified by the definition of annual income in this section above. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Gross rent </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter. <T3>Group home </T3>means a single family residential structure designedor adapted for occupancy by nonelderly handicapped individuals. <T3>Handicapped family </T3>means: (a) Families of two or more persons the head of which (or his or her spouse)is handicapped; (b) The surviving member or members or any family described in paragraph(a) of this definition living in a unit assisted under this part with thedeceased member of the family at the time of his or her death; (c) A single handicapped person between the ages of 18 and 62; or(d) Two or more handicapped persons living together, or one or more suchpersons living with another person who is determined by HUD, based upona licensed physician's certificate provided by the family, to be essentialto their care or well being. <T3>Handicapped person or individual </T3>means any adult having an impairmentwhich is expected to be of long-continued and indefinite duration, is asubstantial impediment to his or her ability to live independently, andis of a nature that such ability could be improved by more suitable housingconditions. A person shall also be considered handicapped if he or sheis developmentally disabled, <T3>i.e</T3>., if he or she has a severe chronic disability that:(a) Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination ofmental and physical impairments;(b) Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two; (c) Is likely to continue indefinitely; (d) Results in substantial functional limitations in three or more of thefollowing areas of major life activity: (1) Self-care, (2) Receptive and responsive language, (3) Learning, (4) (Mobility, (5) Self-direction, (6) Capacity for independent living, and (7) Economic self-sufficiency; and (e) Reflects the person's need for a combination and sequence of special,interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services whichare of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">A person shall also be considered to be handicapped if he or she ischronically mentally ill, <T3>i.e., </T3>if he or she has a severe and persistent mental or emotionalimpairment that seriously limits his or her ability to live independently(<T3>e.g</T3>., by limiting functional capacities relative to primary aspectsof daily living such as personal relations, living arrangements, work,recreational, etc.), and whose impairment could be improved by more suitablehousing conditions. Alcoholism and drug addiction are not included withinthe definition of chronically mentally ill. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Housing for handicapped families </T3>means housing and related facilitiesoccupied by handicapped families that are primarily nonelderly handicappedfamilies. <T3>Independent living complex </T3>means a project designed for occupancyby nonelderly handicapped families in separate dwelling units where eachdwelling unit includes a kitchen and a bath. <T3>Independent public accountant </T3>means a certified public accountantor a licensed or registered public accountant, having no business relationshipwith the Borrower or Sponsor except for the performance of audit, systemswork and tax preparation. If not certified, the independent public accountantmust have been licensed or registered by a regulatory authority of a Stateor other political subdivision of the United States on or before December31, 1970. In States that do not regulate the use of the title ``publicaccountant'', only certified public accountants may be used. <T3>Nonelderly handicapped family </T3>means a handicapped family wherethe head of the family (and spouse, if any) are less than 62 years of ageat the time of the family's initial occupancy of a project. <T3>Project account </T3>means a specifically identified and segregatedaccount for each project which is established in accordance with andSection;885.910(b) out of the amounts by which the maximum annual commitments exceedsthe amount actually paid out under the PAC each year. <T3>PAC </T3>(project assistance contract) means the contract entered intoby the Borrower and HUD setting forth the rights and duties of the partieswith respect to the project and the payments under the PAC. <T3>Project assistance payment </T3>means the payment made by HUD to theBorrower for assisted units as provided in the PAC. The payment is thedifference between the contract rent and the tenant rent. An additionalpayment is made to a family occupying an assisted unit in an independentliving complex when the utility allowance is greater than the total tenentpayment. A project assistance payment, known as a ``vacancy payment'',may be made to the Borrower when an assisted unit (or residential spacein a group home) is vacant, in accordance with the terms of the PAC. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Rent, </T3>in the case of a unit in a cooperative project, means thecarrying charges payable to the cooperative with respect to occupancy ofthe unit. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Tenant rent </T3>means the monthly amount defined in, and determinedin accordance with Part 813 of this chapter. <T3>Total tenant payment </T3>means the monthly amount defined in, anddetermined in accordance with Part 813 of this chapter. <T3>Utility allowance </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter and isdetermined or approved by HUD. <T3>Utility reimbursement </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter.<T3>Vacancy payment </T3>means the project assistance payment made to theBorrower by HUD for a vacant assisted unit (or residential space in a grouphome) if certain conditions are fulfilled, as provided in the PAC. Theamount of the vacancy payment varies with the length of the vacancy periodand is less after the first 60 days of any vacancy. Subparts E and F_[Reserved] 8. Subparts E and F would be reserved. 9. Subpart G would be added to read as follows;<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Projects for Nonelderly Handicapped Families</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Application Procedures and Program Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.700 Allocation of authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.705 Announcement of fund availability and invitation for applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.710 Application contents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.717 Project standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.720 Project size limitations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.725 Cost containment and modest design standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.727 Prohibited facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.730 Site and neighborhood standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.735 Prohibited relationships.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.740 Other Federal requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Selection of Applications and Duration of Fund Reservation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.750 Review of applications for fund reservation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.755 Approval of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.770 Duration of Section 202 fund reservations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.775 Transition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Direct Loan Financing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.780 Submission of site information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.800 Request for direct loan financing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.805 Approval of requests for direct loan financing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.807 Operating cost standard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.810 Amount and terms of financing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.812 Prepayment of loans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.815 Requirements prior to initial loan closing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.816 Requirements for awarding construction contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.820 Loan disbursement procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.825 Completion of cost certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Project Assistance Contract</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.900 Project assistance contract.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.905 Term of PAC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.910 Maximum annual commitment and project account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.915 Leasing to eligible families.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.920 PAC administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.925 Default by Borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.930 Notice upon PAC expiration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Project Management</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.940 Responsibilities of Borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.945 Replacement reserve.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.950 Selection and admission of tenants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.955 Obligations of the family.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.960 Overcrowded and underoccupied units.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.965 Lease requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.970 Termination of tenancy and modification of lease.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.972 Security deposits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.975 Adjustment of rents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.980 Adjustment of utility allowances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.985 Conditions for receipt of vacancy payments for assisted units.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart G_Projects for Nonelderly Handicapped Families</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Application Procedures and Program Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.700 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allocation of authority.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Headquarters reserve. </T3>Up to 15 percent of the section 202 loanauthority made available for the development costs of housing for handicappedfamilies under this section may be retained by the Assistant Secretaryfor subsequent allocation to specific areas and communities under section213(d)(4) of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974.(b) <T3>Allocations. </T3>The Assistant Secretary will allocate the amountsavailable for development costs of housing for handicapped families, lessany amounts made available for the Headquarters Reserve under paragraph(a) of this section and amendments under andSection; 885.755(e), to allocationareas. The size of the allocation area will depend on the amount of loanauthority available for allocation and the number of feasible projectsthe loan authority will support. The amount of the allocations will bebased on the relative needs of the allocation areas as reflected in availablecensus data on the number of handicapped individuals in the areas and willbe adjusted to take into consideration the relative differences betweenthe areas in the costs of providing housing. Funds allocated to an allocationarea may be reallocated to another area under the circumstances describedat andSection; 885.750(d)(2).(c) <T3>Availability of loan authority for housing for the elderly. </T3>Ifthe approvable applications under this subpart require less than the loanauthority that is made available for development costs of housing underthis subpart, the remaining loan authority shall be made available forhousing for the elderly under Subparts B through D of this part, to theextent that housing assistance under section 8 of the United States HousingAct of 1937 is available in connection with such loan authority.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.705 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Announcement of fund availability and invitation for applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Announcement of fund availability. </T3>Following an allocation ofauthority under andSection; 885.700 above, HUD will publish an announcementof fund availability in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>The announcement will indicate: (1) The amount of loan authority (and approximate number of units) madeavailable for housing for handicapped families within each allocation area;(2) The deadline for receipt of applications; and(3) Other appropriate guidance to prospective Sponsors.(b) <T3>Invitation for applications. </T3>Each field office shall publish aninvitation for applications for section 202 fund reservation in newspapersof general circulation serving the field office jurisdiction. The fieldoffice shall also notify minority media, minority organizations involvedin housing and community development, and groups with special interestin housing for handicapped families. Copies of the invitation will be availablein the field office.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.710 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application contents.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Application. </T3>Each application must include all of the information,materials, forms, and exhibits listed in paragraph (b) of this section.In addition, the application may include site information specified underandSection; 885.780. HUD will review applications and make selections underandSection; 885.750 based on information provided in the application.(b) <T3>Application contents. </T3>Each application must include:(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the Sponsor.(2) The name, title, address, and telephone number of the officer or memberof the board of directors of the Sponsor to whom communications shouldbe addressed.(3) The dollar amount of the section 202 direct loan requested. (4) A narrative description of the proposed housing, consistent with requirementsof andSection;andSection; 885.717 through 885.727, including:(i) The name of the locality in which the proposed project is to be developed;(ii) The development method proposed to be used (New construction, substantialrehabilitation, or, if a group home, acquisition with or without moderaterehabilitation);(iii) Numbers and types of structures;(iv) Number of stories;(v) Number of units by size (number of bedrooms) for an independent livingcomplex, or the number of bedrooms and the number of residents housed ineach group home;(vi) Special amenities or features. If the narrative description indicatesthat the housing would not comply with the cost containment and modestdesign standards of andSection; 885.725 (a) through (c), the Sponsor mustsubmit evidence demonstrating that the proposed housing is eligible foran exception from these standards under andSection; 885.725(d).(vii) For Intermediate Care Facilities serving the mentally retarded, evidencedemonstarting that the proposed project will primarily provide housingrather than medical facilities, is or will be licensed by appropriate Stateagencies, and will receive funding from sources other than HUD for a rentcontribution and for the costs of the intermediate care, and such otherinformation as HUD may require to determine the feasibility of the intermediatecare facility.(5) A narrative description of the anticipated occupancy.(i) The Sponsor must propose project occupancy requirements that limitoccupancy to one or more of the following groups: the chronically mentallyill, the developmentally disabled, or the physically handicapped, and mustdemonstrate a capacity to serve the proposed occupancy group or groups.(ii) The Sponsor must demonstrate that the proposal does not conflict withState or local plans and policies governing the development and operationof facilities to serve handicapped individuals meeting the proposed projectoccupancy requirements, including policies and plans involving State fundingfor and support of supportive services or facilities for handicapped individuals.(6) A service plan description that includes:(i) A description of the category or categories of families the housingand facilities are intended to serve;(ii) A description of the range of supportive services to be provided tothe families including:(A) The name(s) of the agency(s) that will be responsible for providingsupportive services and, if an agency is not the Sponsor, a letter of intentfrom the agency indicating its willingness and ability to provide the services;(B) The manner in which such services will be provided to the families;(C) The services that will be provided on- and off-site; and(D) The staffing plan including residential supervision (if any) and otherstaff necessary to provide the proposed supportive services.(iii) Evidence of funding sources for the supportive services that willbe provided for compensation, including State and local funds availableto assist in the provision of such services, or evidence of commitmentto provide the supportive services from agencies that will not be compensated.(7) Evidence demonstrating that there is an unmet need for the proposedhousing in the areas to be served by the project and demonstrating thatthis need is likely to continue through the term of the project.(8) A statement whether the Sponsor or any affiliated entity has submittedor is planning to submit other applications as a Sponsor or CoSponsor underthis part during the current fiscal year. The Sponsor must also indicatethe city and State where any other proposed project will be located, thenumber of units requested, and the field office where the proposal wasor will be submitted.(9) A request for preliminary determination of eligibility as a nonprofitSponsor, on a form prescribed by HUD.(10) A statement describing the Sponsor's ties to the community includingany statements of support for the project by members of the community inwhich the project is to be located and State and local organizations familiarwith the needs of handicapped individuals meeting the proposed occupancyrequirements.(11) The names and addresses of the officers and directors of the Sponsor,and such other information as required by HUD, together with a resolution,on a form prescribed by HUD, adopted by the Sponsor's board of directors,agreeing that all officers and directors of the Sponsor and the Borrowerwill be required to submit conflict of interest certifications.(12) Satisfactory evidence that the Sponsor:(i) Has the necessary legal authority to sponsor the project and to assistthe Borrower to finance, acquire (with or without moderate rehabilitation),construct or substantially rehabilitate and maintain the project, and toapply for and receive the proposed loan;(ii) Has an effective tax exemption ruling from the Internal Revenue Service,is a nonprofit corporation organized in the Commonwealth of Puerto Ricothat is exempt from income taxation under Puerto Rican law, or is a nonprofitconsumer cooperative that is exempt from income taxation under State law;has never been liable for the payment of Federal income taxes; and doesnot pay patronage dividends; and (iii) Will form a Borrower (as defined in andSection; 885.5) after the issuanceof the section 202 fund reservation, will cause the Borrower to file arequest for determination of eligibility and a request for direct loanfinancing under andSection; 885.800, and will provide sufficient resourcesto the Borrower to ensure the development and long-term operation of theproject.(13) Evidence of previous participation in HUD programs, if any, by theSponsor, its officers or directors, on such form as may be prescribed byHUD, and identification of all section 202 fund reservations issued tothe Sponsor or any entity affiliated with the Sponsor since May 1, 1976.(14) A description of any other rental housing projects or any medicalfacilities sponsored, owned or operated by the Sponsor.(15) A description of the Sponsor's past or current involvement in anyprograms or of its provision of services, other than housing, that demonstratesthe Sponsor's management capabilities and experience, including a descriptionof the Sponsor's experience in contracting for services with minority businessenterprises or minority groups.(16) A description of any financial default, modification of terms andconditions of financing, or legal action taken or pending against the Sponsoror its officers, directors, or trustees in their corporate capacity.(17) A description of the Sponsor's ability and willingness to sponsorand to assist the Borrower to develop, own, manage, and provide appropriateservices in connection with housing for the nonelderly handicapped.(18) An estimate of start-up expenses and the source of funds to meet theseexpenses. If the Sponsor plans to use section 106(b) seed money loans,an application for such loan must be submitted, with required attachments.(19) Evidence of the Sponsor's financial ability and willingness to fundthe minimum capital investment under andSection; 885.810(i) and to ensurethe development and long-term operation of the project, including copiesof balance sheets and statements of income and expenses for each of thepast three years that the Sponsor has operated.(20) A housing consultant's certificate and contract (if consultant serviceshave been used by the Sponsor).(21) Evidence that the Sponsor has submitted copies of the applicationto the State single point of contact for review and comment under 24 CFRPart 52 and Executive Order No. 12372_Intergovernmental Review of FederalPrograms.(22) A signed certification of the Sponsor's intention to comply with thenondiscrimination and equal opportunity requirements of andSection; 885.740(a).(23) A demonstration that the Sponsor meets all other requirements imposedby HUD. Notice of such requirements will be made available to Sponsorsbefore submission of their applications.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.717 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Project standards.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Property standards. </T3>Projects under this subpart must comply withHUD Minimum Property Standards.(b) <T3>Minimum group home standards. </T3>Each group home must provide a minimumof 290 square feet of pro rated space for each resident, including a minimumarea of 80 square feet for each resident in a shared bedroom (with no morethan two residents occupying a shared bedroom) and a minimum area of 100square feet for a single occupant bedroom; at least one full bathroom forevery four residents; space for recreation at indoor and outdoor locationson the project site; and sufficient storage for each resident in the bedroomand other storage space necessary for the operation of the home.(c) <T3>Accessibility requirements. </T3>(1) Projects under this subpart mustcomply with the Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards and 24 CFR Part8.(2) All entrances, common areas, units to be occupied by a residentialsupervisor, and amenities must be readily accessible to and usable by personswith physical handicaps.(3) In projects for chronically mentally ill individuals, a minimum of10 percent of all dwelling units in an independent living complex (or 10percent of all bedrooms and bathrooms in a group home), but at least oneof each such space, must be designed to be accessible or adaptable forpersons with physical handicaps.(4) In projects for developmentally disabled or physically handicappedindividuals, all dwelling units in an independent living complex (or allbedrooms and bathrooms in a group home) must be designed to be accessibleor adaptable for persons with physical handicaps. A project involving substantialrehabilitation or an acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitationmay provide a lesser number if:(i) The cost of providing full accessibility makes the project financiallyinfeasible;(ii) Less than one-half of the intended occupants have mobility impairments;and(iii) The project complies with the requirements of 24 CFR 8.23.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.720</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Project size limitations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Maximum project size. </T3>Projects under this subpart are subjectto the following project size limitations:(1) Group homes may not be designed to serve more than 15 persons on onesite;(2) Independent living complexes for chronically mentally ill individualsmay not be designed to serve more than 20 persons on one site; and (3) Independent living complexes for handicapped families in developmentaldisability or physically handicapped occupancy categories may not havemore than 24 units on one site.(b) <T3>Additional limitations. </T3>Based on the amount of loan authorityappropriated for a fiscal year, HUD may impose additional limitations onthe number of units or residents that may be proposed under an applicationfor section 202 loan fund reservation. This unit limitation will be publishedin the annual announcement of fund availability or the invitation for section202 fund reservation under andSection; 885.705.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.725</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cost containment and modest design standards.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Restrictions on amenities. </T3>Projects must be modest in design.Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this section, amenities must belimited to those amenities, as determined by HUD, that are generally providedin unassisted decent, safe and sanitary housing for lower income familiesin the market area. Amenities not eligible for HUD funding include balconies,atriums, decks, bowling alleys, swimming pools, saunas and jacuzzis. Dishwashers,trash compactors, and space or mechanical hook-ups for washers and dryersin individual units will not be funded in independent living complexes.The use of durable materials to control or reduce maintenance, repair andreplacement costs is not an excess amenity.(b) <T3>Unit sizes. </T3>For independent living complexes, HUD will establishlimitations on the size of units and number of bathrooms, based on thenumber of bedrooms that are in the unit.(c) <T3>Special spaces and accommodations. </T3>The costs of construction ofspecial spaces and accommodations may not exceed 10 percent of the totalcost of construction, except as provided in paragraph (d) of this section.Special spaces and accommodations include multipurpose rooms, game rooms,libraries, lounges and, in independent living complexes, central kitchensand dining rooms. Special spaces and accommodations exclude offices, halls,mechanical rooms, laundry rooms, and parking areas, and dwelling unitsand lobbies in independent living complexes; and bedrooms, living rooms,dining and kitchen areas, shared bathrooms, and resident staff dwellingunits in group homes.(d) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>HUD may approve a project that does not comply withthe cost containment and modest design standards of paragraphs (a) through(c) of this section if:(1) The Sponsor demonstrates a willingness and ability to contribute theincremental development cost and continuing operating costs associatedwith the additional amenities or design features; or(2) The proposed project involves substantial rehabilitation or acquisitionwith or without moderate rehabilitation, the additional amenities or designfeatures were incorporated into the existing structure before the submissionof the application, and the total development cost of the project withthe additional amenities or design features does not exceed the cost limitsdescribed in andSection; 885.810.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.727</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited facilities.</ITAG>Project facilities may not include commercial spaces, infirmaries, nursingstations, spaces dedicated to the delivery of medical treatment or physicaltherapy, padded rooms, or space for respite care or sheltered workshops.Except for office space used by the Borrower exclusively for the administrationof the project, project facilities may not include office space.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.730</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Site and neighborhood standards.</ITAG>(a) The site and neighborhood standards of andSection; 880.206 (a) through(h), and (j) of this chapter apply to new construction projects. The siteand neighborhood standards of andSection; 881.206 (a) through (g), and (i)of this chapter apply to substantial rehabilitation projects and projectsinvolving acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation.(b) Projects must be located in neighborhoods where other family housingis located. Except as provided below, projects may not be located adjacentto the following facilities, or in areas where such facilities are concentrated:schools or day-care centers for handicapped persons, workshops, medicalfacilities, or other housing primarily serving handicapped persons. Projectsmay be located adjacent to other housing primarily serving handicappedpersons if the projects together do not exceed the project size limitationsunder andSection; 885.720(a).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.735</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited relationships.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Conflicts of interest. </T3>Officers, directors, trustees, members,stockholders and authorized representatives of the Borrower, and officersand directors of the Sponsor may not have any financial interest in anycontract in connection with the rendition of services, the provision ofgoods or supplies, project management, procurement of furnishings or equipment,construction of the project, procurement of the site or other matters relatedto the development and operation of the project. Management contracts (includingassociated management fees) entered into by the Borrower with the Sponsoror the Sponsor's nonprofit affiliate will not constitute a conflict ofinterest if no more than one person salaried by the Sponsor or managementaffiliate serves on the Borrower's board of directors.(b) <T3>Interest in earnings. </T3>No part of the net earnings of the Borroweror Sponsor may inure to the benefit of any private shareholder, contributor,or individual.(c) <T3>Control of Borrower or Sponsor. </T3>Neither the Borrower nor the Sponsormay be controlled by, or under the direction of, persons or entities seekingto derive profit or gain as a result of activities undertaken by the Borroweror Sponsor.(d) <T3>Provision of services. </T3>A person or an entity (including an affiliatedentity) may not provide services to a project in more than one of the followingcapacities: Attorney, architect, contractor, housing consultant, managementagent, or seller of the site for the project, except that the same personor entity may serve a project as management agent and housing consultant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.740</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other Federal requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Nondiscrimination and equal opportunity. </T3>Participation in thisprogram requires compliance with:(1) The requirements of Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42U.S.C. 3601-19) (Fair Housing Act) and its implementing regulations; ExecutiveOrder No. 11063 (Equal Opportunity in Housing) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 107; and Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C.2000d) (Nondiscrimination in Federally Assisted Programs) and implementingregulations at 24 CFR Part 1;(2) The prohibitions against discrimination on the basis of age under theAge Discrimination Act of 1975 (42 U.S.C. 6101-07) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 146, and the prohibitions against discrimination againstotherwise qualified individuals with handicaps under section 504 of theRehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 8;(3) The requirements of Executive Order No. 11246 (Equal Employment Opportunity)and the regulations issued under the Order at 41 CFR Chapter 60;(4) The requirements of section 3 of the Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct of 1968 (12 U.S.C. 1701u) (Employment Opportunities for Lower IncomePersons in Connection with Assisted Projects) and the implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 135;(5) The requirements of Executive Order Nos. 11625, 12432, and 12138 (Minorityand Women's Business Enterprises);(6) The affirmative fair housing marketing requirements of 24 CFR Part200, Subpart M and the implementing regulations at 24 CFR Part 108;(7) The fair housing advertising and poster guidelines, 24 CFR Parts 109and 110.(b) <T3>Environmental. </T3>The National Environmental Policy Act of 1969,HUD's implementing regulations at 24 CFR Part 50, including the relatedauthorities described in 24 CFR 50.4, and the Coastal Barrier ResourcesAct of 1982 (16 U.S.C. 3601) apply to this program. For the purposes ofExecutive Order No. 11988, Floodplain Management, all applications underthis program shall be treated as critical actions requiring considerationof the 500-year flood plain.(c) <T3>Flood insurance. </T3>The Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 (42U.S.C. 4001) applies to this program.(d) <T3>Labor standards. </T3>For projects that are designed for dwelling useby 12 or more handicapped families (other than projects acquired withoutrehabilitation), participation in this program is subject to the followingrequirements.(1) Not less than the wages prevailing in the locality, as determined bythe Secretary of Labor under the Davis-Bacon Act (40 U.S.C. 276a-276a-5),must be paid to all laborers and mechanics employed in the constructionor rehabilitation of the project. HUD may waive the Davis-Bacon requirementsif laborers or mechanics voluntarily donate their services without fullcompensation for the purposes of lowering the costs of construction orrehabilitation; the laborers or mechanics are not otherwise employed inthe construction or rehabilitation of projects that are assisted underthis part and designed for dwelling use by 12 or more families; and HUDdetermines that any amounts saved are fully credited to the Borrower undertakingthe construction or rehabilitation.(2) Except where the Davis-Bacon requirements have been waived under paragraph(c)(1) of this section, contracts involving employment of laborers andmechanics shall be subject to the provisions of the Contract Work Hoursand Safety Standards Act (40 U.S.C. 327-333).(3) Sponsors, Borrowers, contractors and subcontractors must comply withall related rules, regulations, and requirements.(e) <T3>Relocation assistance. </T3>The Uniform Relocation Assistance and RealProperty Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (42 U.S.C. 4601) and governmentwideimplementing regulations at 49 CFR Part 24 apply to this program.(f) <T3>Lead-based paint. </T3>(1) The requirements of the Lead-Based PointPoisoning Prevention Act (42 U.S.C. 4821-4846) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 35 (except as superseded in paragraph (f)(2) of this sectionapply to the dwellings (except zero-bedroom dwelling units) in housingassisted under this Subpart which was constructed or substantially rehabilitatedbefore 1978 and in which any child under seven years of age resides oris expected to reside.(2)(i) This paragraph implements the provisions of section 302 of the Lead-BasedPaint Poisoning Prevention Act, 42 U.S.C. 4822, by establishing proceduresto eliminate, as far as practicable, the hazards of lead-based paint poisoningwith respect to covered structures for which assistance is provided underthis program. This paragraph is promulgated under 24 CFR 35.24(b)(4) andsupersedes, with respect to the program, the requirements prescribed inSubpart C of 24 CFR Part 35.(ii) The following definitions apply to this paragraph (f):<T3>Applicable surface </T3>means all intact and nonintact painted interiorand exterior surfaces of a residential structure.<T3>Chewable surface </T3>means all chewable protruding painted surfacesup to five feet from the floor or ground, which are readily accessibleto children under seven years of age, e.g., protruding corners, windowsillsand frames, doors and frames, and other protruding woodworks.<T3>Defective paint surfaces </T3>means paint on applicable surfaces thatis cracking, scaling, chipping, peeling, or loose.<T3>Elevated blood lead level or EBL </T3>means excessive absorption oflead: that is, a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood of 25 ug/dl(micrograms of lead per deciliter of whole blood) or greater.<T3>Lead-based paint </T3>means a paint surface, whether or not defective,identified as having a lead content greater than or equal to 1 mg/cm\2\.(iii) In the case of a structure constructed before 1978 or substantiallyrehabilitated prior to 1978, the Sponsor must inspect the structure fordefective paint surfaces before it submits site information under andSection;885.780. If defective paint surfaces are found, treatment in accordancewith 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii) is required. Correction of defective surfacesfound during the initial inspection must be completed before initial occupancyof the project.(iv) In the case of a structure constructed before 1978 or substantiallyrehabilitated prior to 1978, if the Borrower is presented with test resultsthat indicate that a child under the age of seven years occupies the structureand has an elevated blood lead level (EBL), the Borrower must cause theunit to be tested for lead-based paint on chewable surfaces. Testing mustbe conducted by a State or local health or housing agency, by an inspectorcertified or regulated by a State or local health or housing agency, oran organization recognized by HUD. Lead content shall be tested by usingan X-ray fluorescence analysis (XRF) or other method approved by HUD. Testreadings of 1 mg/cm\2\ or higher using an XRF shall be considered positivefor presence of lead-based paint. Where lead-based paint on chewable surfacesis identified, covering or removal of the paint surface in accordance with24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii) is required.(v) Where abatement will result from rehabilitation activities planned(<T3>i.e.,</T3> where all applicable surfaces will be replaced, coveredor otherwise abated as described in this part), these surfaces need notbe tested. (vi) In lieu of the procedures set forth in the proceding clause, the Borrowermay, at its descretion, abate all interior and exterior chewable surfacesin accordance with the methods set out at 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii). (vii) The Borrower must take appropriate action to protect tenants fromhazards associated with abatement procedures.(viii) The Borrower must keep a copy of each inspection report for at leastthree years. If a unit requires testing, or treatment of chewable surfacesbased on the testing, the Borrower must keep the test results, and, ifapplicable, the certification of treatment indefinitely. The records mustindicate which chewable surfaces in the units have been tested or treated.If records establish that certain chewable surfaces were tested, or testedand treated, in accordance with the standards prescribed in this section,these surfaces do not have to be tested or treated at any subsequent time.(g) <T3>Intergovernmental review.</T3> The requirements for intergovernmentalreview in Executive Order No. 12372 and the implementing regulations at24 CFR Part 52 are applicable to this program.<ITAG tagnum="84">Selection of Applications and Duration of Fund Reservation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.750</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of applications for fund reservation.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Preliminary evaluation.</T3> (1) HUD will perform a preliminary reviewof every application. To be eligible for technical review, the applicationmust meet each of the criteria described below.(i) The application must be received by HUD at the appropriate addresswithin the time period specified in the invitation, and must be complete.(ii) The Sponsor must be eligible to participate in the program.(iii) The proposed facilities and proposed occupancy requirements mustbe eligible under the program.(iv) The application must include a supportive services plan meeting therequirements of andSection; 885.710(b)(6).(2) Following the completion of the preliminary evaluation of all applications,HUD will notify Sponsors of applications that are found to be unapprovable.The notification will be in writing and will explain the reasons for HUD'saction.(b) <T3>Technical review processing.</T3> (1) HUD will perform a technicalreview of each application that is found to be acceptable under the preliminaryevaluation. Technical review processing will consist of the following:(i) HUD will review the application to determine if:(A) The Sponsor has demonstrated financial and management capability tocarry the project through to completion.(B) The Sponsor has previous experience in developing or operating housing,medical, or other facilities, or experience in providing supportive servicesto individuals of the disability group(s) proposed to be housed. (C) The Sponsor has made a commitment and will be able to provide the preliminarydevelopment costs and the minimum capital investment.(D) The narrative description submitted under andSection; 885.710(b)(4) isappropriate for handicapped individuals meeting the proposed project occupancyrequirements, and indicates that the proposed project is likely to complywith the project standards described in andSection; 885.717, the projectsize limitations of andSection; 885.720, the modest design and cost containmentstandards of andSection; 885.725, and the facility prohibitions of andSection;885.727.(E) The locality (or the site, if the Sponsor has submitted evidence underandSection; 885.780) is likely to meet the site and neighborhood standardsof andSection; 885.730. If the Sponsor has submitted site information withthe application, HUD will also determine if the site is acceptable underandSection; 885.780, including environmental review and flood hazard requirements.If a Sponsor has provided site evidence and HUD determines that the siteis unacceptable, HUD will process the application as if no site evidencehas been submitted.(F) The service plan description under andSection; 885.710(b)(6) is directedto the needs of individuals with the type of disability the project proposesto serve, and demonstrates the Sponsor's ability to provide or assure theprovision of the proposed supportive services to such individuals.(G) The proposed project does not conflict with State or local plans andpolicies governing the development and operation of facilities to serveindividuals with the type of disability the project proposes to serve.(H) There is evidence of effective demand for the proposed project. (I) The Sponsor is in compliance with nondiscrimination and equal opportunityrequirements. (J) The application is otherwise responsive to the invitation for applicationsand the requirements of this part.(ii) During technical review processing, HUD will also review the comments(if any) received from the State single point of contact, and will determineif the proposed project is located in a locality that is acceptable underandSection; 885.780(c)(3)(i).(2) Based on the factors set forth in this paragraph (b), HUD will determinewhich applications are approvable. Selections will be made in accordancewith paragraphs (c) and (d) of this section.(c) <T3>Ranking.</T3> (1) HUD will assign a rating to each application foundto be approvable under technical review processing, based upon HUD's assessmentof:(i) The degree to which the Sponsor has demonstrated, relative to otherproposals:(A) Its capacity and commitment to assist the Borrower to carry the projectthrough to long-term operation;(B) The Sponsor's ability and commitment to provide the Borrower with thefinancial resources to establish and ensure the long-term operation ofthe proposed project;(C) The need in the locality for a project serving handicapped invidividualsmeeting the proposed project occupancy requirements; (D) Support for the proposed project from the local community, includingState and local organizations familiar with the needs of handicapped individualsmeeting the proposed project occupancy requirements; and (E) The Sponsor's ability to provide or facilitiate the provision of theproposed supportive services to handicapped individuals meeting the proposedproject occupancy requirements.(ii) The degree to which the application supports minority enterprise;involves a small research or demonstration project; or provides an innovativehousing program or alternative method of meeting lower income housing needs.(2) HUD may also assign additional rating points to applications that includesatisfactory evidence of approvable site (see andSection; 885.780) or, forgroup homes, that propose to use acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitationas the development method. If additional points for these factors willbe awarded, the announcement of funds availability under andSection; 885.705will include the maximum number of points that may be awarded under eachfactor.(3) Within each allocation area, HUD shall rank all approvable applicationsin order of their rating scores.(d) <T3>Selection.</T3> (1) Based on the ranking under paragraph (c) of thissection, HUD shall select applications in the descending order of fundingpriority that most closely approximates the loan authority provided tothe allocation area. (2) If the amount of loan authority allocated to an area exceeds the amountnecessary to fund all approvable applications in the area, the Departmentshall transfer the unused loan authority from the area to another areaor areas in which there is insufficient loan authority for all approvableapplications.(3) After selection of applications that can be funded with the loan authorityallocated to the allocation areas, HUD may select unfunded but otherwiseapprovable applications for funding from available amounts in the HeadquartersReserve.(4) Following the selection of applications, HUD will notify the Sponsorsof applications that are not approvable after technical review processingunder paragraph (b) of this section, and the Sponsors of applications thatare not selected for funding under this paragraph (d). The notificationwill be in writing and will explain the reasons for HUD's action. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.755</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice of fund reservation.</T3> A Sponsor whose application is approvedwil be issued a notice of section 202 fund reservation in a format prescribedby HUD. The notice of fund reservation will specify:(1) The number and mix of units for an independent living complex or thenumber of residents approved for a group home, the locality of the proposedproject, and the project occupancy requirements approved by HUD; (2) The amount of the section 202 fund reservation equal to the developmentcost limit computed under andSection; 885.810(c);(3) The amount of annual project assistance reserved for the project equalto the sum of the operating cost standard developed under andSection; 885.807plus the annual debt service on the amount of the section 202 fund reservation(computer at an annual interest rate equal to the loan interest rate underandSection; 885.810(f)(1) in effect on the date the notice is issued);(4) The deadline for the Sponsor to return a copy of the notification toHUD with an indication of its acceptance;(5) If the Sponsor did not submit the site information required under andSection;885.780 with the application, the deadline for the Sponsor to submit suchinformation; (6) The deadline for the Borrower to submit a request for direct loan financingand a request for determination of Borrower eligibility under andSection;885.800; and (7) Other guidance to Sponsors and Borrowers (including any additionalevidence required under andSection; 885.800(b)(2)(vii)).(b) <T3>Withdrawal of approval.</T3> If the Sponsor does not accept the notificationby the date specified in the notice of fund reservation, HUD may notifythe Sponsor that approval of the application is withdrawn.(c) <T3>Transfer of reservation.</T3> Except for a transfer of loan fund reservationfrom the Sponsor to the HUD-approved Borrower established by the Sponsor,no part of the loan fund reservation may be transferred.(d) <T3>Use of loan funds.</T3> A section 202 fund reservation may be usedonly for the project that has been approved under the application.(e) <T3>Amendments.</T3> Subject to the availability of funds, HUD may amendthe amount of a fund reservation approved under paragraph (a)(1) of thissection at any time before the final closing of a loan.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.770</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of Section 202 fund reservations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Extension and cancellation of fund reservation.</T3> The duration ofthe initial fund reservation is 18 months from the date of issuance ofthe notice under andSection; 885.755. Subject to the approval of the AssistantSecretary:(1) The field office may, at any time, issue a notice of loan cancellationif the field office determines that the Borrower is not making satisfactoryprogress toward the start of construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition.(2) The field office shall issue a notice of loan cancellation if the construction,substantial rehabilitation, or acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitationof a project is not begun within 18 months after the notice of section202 fund reservation under andSection; 885.755(a) is issued. This 18-monthtime period may be extended if HUD determines that the Borrower is makingsatisfactory progress toward the start of construction, rehabilitationor acquisition with or without rehabilitation. The field office may extendthis time period up to 24 months after the notice of section 202 fund reservationis issued. HUD may grant additional extensions of up to 36 months afterthe notice of section 202 fund reservation is issued.(b) <T3>Notification procedures.</T3> (1) If HUD determines that a fund reservationmust be cancelled under paragraph (a) of this section, the field officeshall mail a notice of loan cancellation to the Borrower by certified mail,return receipt requested. The notice of loan cancellation must:(i) Describe the reasons for the cancellation of the loan authority; and(ii) Advise the Borrower that it may file an appeal of the cancellationwith the field office within 30 days of the receipt of the cancellationnotice, and that the failure to file an appeal will result in the cancellationof the fund reservation upon the expiration of the 30-day period.(2) If the Borrower fails to file an appeal of the loan cancellation within30 days of the receipt of the cancellation notice, the field office shallcancel the fund reservation and provide a written notice of the cancellationto the Borrower.(3) If the Borrower files an appeal within 30 days of the receipt of thecancellation notice, HUD Headquarters will review the appeal and will issuea decision on the appeal within 45 days of the receipt of the appeal. HUDwill approve the appeal if the Borrower demonstrates that it is makingsatisfactory progress toward the start of construction, rehabilitation,or acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation.(i) If HUD approves the appeal, it shall provide a written notificationof the approval to the Borrower. The notification shall indicate the durationof the extended fund reservation. (ii) If HUD disapproves the appeal, it shall notify the Borrower in writingof the determination, and cancel the fund reservation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.775 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transition. </ITAG>At any time before initial loan closing, a Sponsor or Borrower that receiveda reservation of loan authority under section 202 of the Housing Act of1959 and a reservation of contract authority for housing assistance paymentsunder section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 for a projectfor nonelderly handicapped families under Subparts B through D of thisPart, may submit a request to HUD to substitute project assistance paymentsunder this Subpart G for the Section 8 housing assistance payments. AfterHUD completes its selections for funding in a fiscal year and to the extentthat funds are available for the substitution of project assistance, HUDmay approve a request if: (a) The project is eligible for assistance underthe requirements of this Subpart G; and (b) the project is financiallyinfeasible with contract rents limited by the Section 8 Fair Market Rentsor the substitution would otherwise facilitate the development of the projectin a timely manner. <ITAG tagnum="84">Direct Loan Financing Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.780 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of site information. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Required information</T3>. The following information with respect tothe proposed project is not required with the application, but must beprovided within the time period specified in andSection; 885.755(a)(5). (1) A map showing the location of the site and the racial composition ofthe neighborhood, with any area of racial concentration delineated. (2) Evidence that the proposed acquisition, construction or rehabilitationis permissible under applicable zoning ordinances or regulations, or adescription of the actions required to make the acquisition, constructionor rehabilitation permissible under such laws and ordinances and the basisfor the Sponsor's belief that proposed actions will be completed successfullybefore the receipt of commitment for direct loan financing (<T3>e.g.</T3>, a summary of the results of any recent requests for rezoningclassifications and the time required for such rezoning, preliminary indicationsof acceptability from zoning bodies, etc.). (3) A statement whether the proposed project will displace site occupants.If so, the proposal must state the number of families, individuals, andbusiness concerns to be displaced (identified by race or minority group,and status as owners or renters), must demonstrate that relocation is feasible,and must explain how necessary relocation payments, if any, will be funded.Relocation payments may not be funded from loan proceeds. (4) A showing that the proposal meets any special requirements or restrictionsnecessary for compliance with the local HAP. (b) <T3>HUD review of site information.</T3> HUD will review the Sponsor'ssubmission under paragraph (a) of this section. A site may be approvedif: (1) The site meets the site and neighborhood standards of andSection; 885.730.(2) The Sponsor has demonstrated that the development of the site is permissibleunder applicable local zoning ordinances or regulations or will be permissibleunder such ordinances and regulations before the receipt of the commitmentfor direct loan financing; and(3) Any proposed relocation is feasible and necessary relocation paymentswill be funded from sources other than section 202 loan proceeds. (c) <T3>Additional site requirements_</T3>(1) <T3>Notification to local government.</T3> When site specific informationis received, HUD will forward (if not previously submitted by the Sponsor)a notification, in the form prescribed by HUD, to the chief executive officer(or such persons as that office may designate) of the unit of general localgovernment in which the proposed housing is to be located, and shall invitea response within 30 calender days from the date of the notification letter.HUD will review the comments, if any, received during the response periodfrom the appropriate unit of general local government to determine if theproposed site for the project is approvable under section 213 of the Housingand Community Development Act of 1974. (2) <T3>Environmental review.</T3> HUD will complete an environmental reviewin compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 and therelated authorities in 24 CFR Part 50. (3) <T3>Flood insurance.</T3> Assistance will not be provided for the acquisition,construction, reconstruction, repair, or improvement of a building locatedin an area that has been identified by the Federal Emergency ManagementAgency (FEMA) as having special flood hazards unless (i)(A) the communityin which the area is situated is participating in the National Flood InsuranceProgram in accordance with 44 CFR Parts 59 through 79, or (B) less thana year has passed since FEMA notification to the community regarding suchhazards; and (ii) flood insurance on the structure is obtained in accordancewith section 102(a) of the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 (42 U.S.C.4001).(4) <T3>Coastal barriers</T3><T3>. </T3>Assistance will not be provided for projects in an undevelopedcoastal barrier designated under the Coastal Barrier Resources Act of 1982(16 U.S.C. 3601).(d) <T3>HUD approval. </T3>(1) If HUD determines that a site is approvableunder this section, HUD will notify the Sponsor of the approval, includinga statement of any specific environmental conditions that must be met asa condition of HUD approval. The Sponsor must obtain site approval underthis section before it applies for conditional commitment under andSection;885.800(c).(2) If HUD determines that a site is not approvable under this section,HUD will notify the Sponsor of the Disapproval and the reasons for disapproval.If a site is disapproved, the Sponsor may, consistent with its applicationunder andSection; 885.710, obtain a new site and resubmit a request for siteapproval under this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.800</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for direct loan financing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Request for direct loan financing. </T3>A Borrower established by aSponsor receiving a fund reservation must submit a request for direct loanfinancing within the time limit specified in the notice of section 202fund reservation to the field office serving the area in which the proposedproject will be located.(b) <T3>Request for determination of Borrower eligibility. </T3>Simultaneouslywith the request for direct loan financing, the Borrower must submit arequest for determination of eligibility, on a form or forms prescribedby HUD.(1) The Borrower will be required to submit the information required ofSponsors under andSection;885.710(b)(1), (2), (11), (12)(ii) and (iii), (13)and (16), as modified by this paragraph:(i) Borrowers may omit the board of director's resolution required underandSection; 885.710(b)(11), but will be required to submit certificationssigned by all officers and directors of the Sponsor and the Borrower certifyingthat they have not had and will not have any financial interest in anycontract, or in any firm or corporation that has a contract, with the Borrowerin connection with the rendition of services, the provision of goods orsupplies, procurement of furnishings and equipment, construction of theproject, procurement of the site, or other matters, whatsoever. In thecase of officers and directors of the Sponsor, this certification doesnot apply to management contracts (including management fees associatedwith such contracts) entered into by the Borrower with the Sponsor or itsnonprofit affiliate. However, more than one person salaried by the Sponsoror management affiliate may serve on the Borrower's board of directors.(ii) A Borrower will meet the requirements for a tax exemption ruling underandSection; 885.710(b)(12)(ii) if it demonstrates that it applied for a taxexemption ruling under section 501(c) (3) or (4) before filing the requestfor determination of Borrower eligibility.(2) Borrowers will be required to submit sufficient evidence to demonstrate:(i) The Borrower is a nonprofit corporation incorporated separately fromthe Sponsor;(ii) The Borrower has the necessary legal authority to finance, acquire(with or without moderate rehabilitation), construct, or substantiallyrehabilitate and maintain the project, and to apply for and receive thesection 202 loan.(iii) The Borrower meets all corporate organization requirements that HUDmay impose, including requirements that: (A) The purposes of the Borrowerinclude the promotion of the welfare of handicapped families; (B) the articlesof incorporation and by-laws do not include any references to religionor religious purposes; (C) the articles of incorporation must provide thatupon the dissolution of the Borrower, its assets remaining after paymentof all debts and liabilities will be conveyed or distributed only to anorganization created and operated for nonprofit purposes similar to theBorrower, other than one created for a religious purpose; (D) the articlesof incorporation must permit the Sponsor to appoint and remove a majorityof the voting members of the Borrower's board of directors; and (E) thearticles of incorporation must provide that the board of directors willbe composed of a minimum of seven individuals.(iv) The Borrower is not authorized to engage in any other business oractivity (including the operation of another rental property) or incurany liability or obligation not related to the project.(v) The Sponsor has fulfilled its commitment to provide resources to theBorrower, as described in the Sponsor's application under andSection; 885.710(b)(12)(iii) and (19).(vi) The Borrower has submitted a request for preliminary determinationof eligibility as a mortgagor, on a form prescribed by HUD.(vii) The Borrower has submitted such additional evidence as HUD may requirein the notice of section 202 fund reservation under andSection; 885.755.(3) If housing consultant services have been used by the Sponsor, the Borrowermust execute the housing consultant contract and submit it to HUD withthe request for determination of Borrower eligibility.(c) <T3>Conditional commitment processing. </T3>The request for conditionalcommitment processing must be on a form or forms prescribed by HUD andmust include all required exhibits. During conditional commitment, HUDwill:(1) Determine whether the Borrower has established its eligibility underparagraph (b) of this section.(2) Establish the amount of the initial contract rents and any initialutility allowances to be provided in independent living complexes.(i) The amount of the initial contract rent plus any utility allowancesshall not exceed the annual reasonable and necessary operating costs ofthe project plus the debt service on the amount of the section 202 loan.(ii) Operating cost standards developed under andSection;885.807 are usedto evaluate the reasonableness of the operating costs of the proposed project.HUD may approve operating costs that exceed the applicable operating coststandard (including adjustments under andSection;885.807(a)). (iii) If the cost of utilities (except telephone) and other housing servicesare not included in the initial contract rent for an independent livingcomplex, HUD will establish initial utility allowances for the projectbased on the monthly cost of a reasonable consumption of utilties and otherservices for the unit by an energy-conservative household of modest circumstancesconsistent with the requirements of a safe, sanitary, and healthful livingenvironment. The cost of utilities and other housing services for grouphomes will be included in the initial contract rent. (3) Review the site and project design to determine if the Borrower haspresented adequate evidence of site control, and the proposed project complieswith the project standards described in andSection;885.717, the project sizelimitations of andSection;885.720, the modest design and cost containmentstandards of andSection;885.725, and the facility prohibitions of andSection;885.727.To assist in this review, Borrowers will be required to submit the followinginformation with their request for conditional commitment: (i) Documentary evidence that the Sponsor has control of the site. (ii) A sketch of the site plan showing the general development of the siteincludng the location of the proposed buildings, streets, parking areasand drives, service areas, and unusual site features, and architecturalsketches of typical unit plans (including the square feet per unit), floorplans for typical units, floor plans showing special spaces, accommodationsand common areas, and the main elevation of each building. (iii) If the proposed housing does not comply with the cost containmentand modest design standards of andSection;885.725(a) through (c), evidencedemonstrating that the proposed housing is eligible for an excepton fromthese standards under andSection;885.725(d). (iv) A statement describing any proposed methods to be used in the constructionand rehabilitation of the project that will promote construction efficiencies.(4) Establish land value. (5) Evaluate the overall financial feasibility of the project. (6) Evaluate the adequacy of the Borrower's affirmative fair housing marketingplan. (d) <T3>Firm commitment processing. </T3>The request for firm commitment processngmust be on a form or forms prescribed by HUD and must include all requiredexhibits. Processing of a request for a firm commitment will include reviewof the final plans and specifications, review of environmental conditionsto site approval, review of the contractor/Borrower's cost estimate, anda review of the conclusions reached during conditional commitment processing.HUD may permit the Borrower to submit a request for firm commitment withoutprevious conditional commitment processing under certain circumstances(<T3>e.g., </T3>the project involves acquisition with or without moderaterehabilitation or construction projects utilizing designs that have beenpreviously submitted to, and approved by, HUD). Under such circumstances,HUD will perform the steps set forth in paragraph (c) of this section,during firm commitment processing. (e) <T3>Loan interest rate. </T3>When the request for conditional or firm commitmentfor direct loan financing is submitted, the Borrower may request that theloan interest rate be computed at the optional interest rate as providedunder andSection;885.810(f)(2). If the Borrower makes such a request, theloan interest rate used for the processing of the request for conditionalor firm commitment under paragraph (c) or (d) of this section shall bethe optional loan interest rate. If the Borrower does not make a requestfor the optional rate, the interest rate used for processing the requestshall be the interest rate computed under andSection;885.810(f)(1). (f) <T3>Modification of contract rents. </T3>Contract rents proposed by a Borrowermay be modified by HUD at any time before execution of the agreement toenter into a project assistance contract. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.805 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of requests for direct loan financing. </ITAG>HUD will review the request for direct loan financing (including the requestfor determination of Borrower eligibility) and all required exhibits andwill notify the Borrower of its approval by issuance of a conditional orfirm commitment, as appropriate, or of its disapproval of the request.(a) <T3>Issuance of conditional commitment. </T3>A conditional commitment willinclude the followng: (1) The estimated cost of the project; (2) The land value fully improved (with offsite improvements installed)and, if the proposal involves the rehabilitation of a project, the ``asis'' value of the site; (3) The detailed estimates of operating expenses; (4) The financial requirements; (5) The loan amount; (6) The interest rate used in processing the request; (7) The approved contract rents and utility allowances; and (8) The deadline for the submission of the Borrower's request for a firmcommitment for direct loan financing. (b) <T3>Issuance of firm commitment. </T3>A firm commitment will include thefollowing: (1) Approval of the final plans and specifications; (2) A statement that the contractor/Borrower's cost estimates have beenreviewed; (3) Reaffirmation of the conclusions reached during conditional commitmentprocessing or a statement describing the approved changes to earlier conclusions;(4) The interest rate used n the processing of the request. If the Borrower was permitted to apply for a firm commitment without goingthrough conditional commitment processing, the items listed in paragraph(a) of tis section shall be included in the issuance of the firm commitmentfor direct loan financing. Issuance of a firm commitment evidences HUD'sapproval of the request for direct loan financing, and sets forth the termsand conditions upon which the loan shall be made and the loan proceedsdisbursed. (c) <T3>Cancellation. </T3>If a request for Borrower eligibility or a requestfor conditional or firm commitment for direct loan financing is not submittedwithin the time periods specified in the notice of section 202 fund reservationor in the conditional commitment (as appropriate), HUD may cancel the fundreservation under andSection;885.770. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.807 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating cost standard. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>At least annually, HUD shall establish operating coststandards based on the average annual operating cost of comparable housingfor handicapped families in each field office. The operating cost standardsshall be developed for group homes based on the number of residents, andfor independent living complexes based on the number of units. HUD mayadjust the operating cost standard applicable to an approved project toreflect additional operating costs necessary to serve handicapped individualsmeeting the project occupancy requirements, and to reflect differencesin costs based on location within the field office jurisdiction. The operatingcost standard will be used to determine the amount of the project assistancereserved for a project under andSection;885.755(a)(3) and to review the reasonablenessof operating costs for the establishment of initial contract rents at thetime of issuance of the conditional commitment under under andSection;885.800(a).(b) <T3>Operating cost. </T3>Costs included in the computation of the operatingcost standard are: (1) Administrative expenses, including salary and management expenses relatedto the provision of shelter. Operating costs exclude expenses related toadministering, or managing the provision of, supportive services. (2) Maintenance expenses, including routine and minor repairs and groundskeeping.(3) Security expenses. (4) Utilities expenses, including gas, oil, electricity, water, sewer,trash removal, and extermination services. Operating costs exclude telephoneservices for families. (5) Taxes and insurance. (6) Allowances for reserves. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.810 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amount and terms of financing. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Amount of financing. </T3>The amount of financing approved shall bethe amount stated in the notice of fund reservation, including any increaseapproved by HUD before the final closing of a loan. The amount of financingmay not exceed the lesser of the amounts provided in paragraphs (b) through(e) of this section. (b) <T3>Estimated development cost. </T3>The amount of the loan may not exceedthe total estimated development cost of the project (as determined by HUD),less the incremental development cost and capitalized operating costs associatedwith excess amenities and design features to be paid for by the Sponsorunder andSection;885.725(d)(1). (c) <T3>Development cost limit. </T3>(1) For independent living complexes,the total development cost of the property or project attributable to dwellinguse (less the incremental development cost and capitalized operating costsdescribed in paragraph (b) of this section) may not exceed: (i) For independent living complexes without elevators: (A) $28,032 per family unit without a bedroom; (B) $32,321 per family unit with one bedroom; (C) $38,979 per family unit with two bedrooms; (D) $49,893 per family unit with three bedrooms; (E) $55,583 per family unit with four or more bedrooms. (ii) For independent living complexes with elevators: (A) $29,500 per family unit without a bedroom; (B) $33,816 per family unit with one bedroom; (C) $41,120 per family unit with two bedrooms; (D) $53,195 per family unit with three bedrooms; (E) $58,392 per family unit with four or more bedrooms. (2) For group homes, the total development cost of the project may notexceed the cost limit for the project. HUD will periodically establishcost limits for various sizes of group homes by publishing a notice ofthe cost limits in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>The cost limits will reflect those costs reasonableand necessary to develop a project of a size that will accommodate thespecified number of residents and comply with HUD minimum property standards;the minimum square footage requirements, bathroom and recreational arearequirements of andSection;885.717; cost containment and modest design standardsof andSection;885.725 and other design requirements applicable to group homesunder this part. To develop the cost limit for group homes, HUD will usecommercially available construction cost indices and construction costdata for recently completed comparable group homes. (3) Increased mortgage limits. (i) The Assistant Secretary may increase the cost limits set forth in paragraphs(c) (1) and (2) of this section by up to 110 percent in any geographicarea where the cost levels require, and may increase the cost limits byup to 140 percent on a project-by-project basis. (ii) If the Assistant Secretary finds that high construction costs in Alaska,Guam or Hawaii make it infeasible to construct dwellings, without the sacrificeof sound standards of construction, design, and livability, within thecost limits provided in this paragraph (c), the principal amount of mortgagesmay be increased to compensate for such costs. The increase may not exceedthe limitations established under this section (including any high costarea adjustment) by more than 50 percent. (d) <T3>Rehabilitation projects_additional limits. </T3>A loan that involvesa project to be rehabilitated is subject to the following additional limitations:(1) <T3>Property held in fee. </T3>If the Sponsor is the fee simple owner ofa property unencumbered by a mortgage, the maximum loan amount may notexceed 100 percent of the cost of the proposed rehabilitation. (2) <T3>Property subject to existing mortgage. </T3>If the Sponsor owns theproperty subject to an outstanding indebtedness that is to be refinancedwith part of the section 202 loan, the maximum loan amount may not exceedthe cost of rehabilitation plus the portion of the outstanding indebtednessthat does not exceed the fair market value of the land and improvementsbefore the rehabilitation, as determined by HUD. (3) <T3>Property to be acquired. </T3>If the property is to be acquired bythe Borrower from an entity other than the Sponsor, and the purchase priceis to be financed with a part of the section 202 loan, the maximum loanamount may not exceed the cost of the rehabilitation plus the portion ofthe purchase price that does not exceed the fair market value of such landand improvements before the rehabilitation, as determined by HUD. (e) <T3>Leaseholds. </T3>If a loan is secured by a leasehold estate ratherthan by a fee simple estate, the amount of the loan attributable to thecost of the property may not exceed the value of the leasehold estate.(f) <T3>Loan interest rate. </T3>The loan is made on the date of the initialloan closing under andSection;885.815. Loans shall bear interest at a ratedetermined by HUD in accordance with this section. (1) <T3>Annual interest rate.</T3> Except as provided under paragraph (f)(2),loans shall bear interest at the rate in effect at the time the loan ismade. The loan interest rate shall not exceed:(i) The average yield on the most recently issued 30-year marketable obligationsof the United States during the three-month period immediately precedingthe fiscal year in which the loan is made (adjusted to the nearest one-eighthof one percent), plus an allowance to cover administrative costs and probablelosses under the program; and(ii) Any applicable statutory ceiling on the loan interest rate includingthe allowance to cover administrative costs and probable losses.(2) <T3>Optional interest rate.</T3> The Borrower may elect an optional loaninterest rate. To elect the optional rate, the Borrower must request thatHUD determine the loan interest rate at the time of the Borrower's requestfor conditional or firm commitment for direct loan financing under andSection;885.800.(i) If the Borrower elects the optional loan interest rate, the loan interestrate shall not exceed:(A) The average yield on the most recently issued 30-year marketable obligationsof the United States during the three-month period immediately precedingthe fiscal year in which the request for commitment is submitted (adjustedto the nearest one-eighth of one percent), plus an allowance to cover administrativecosts and probable losses under the program;(B) The average yield on the most recently issued 30-year marketable obligationsof the United States during the one-month period immediately precedingthe month in which the request for commitment is submitted (adjusted tothe nearest one-eighth of one percent), plus an allowance to cover theadministrative costs and probable losses under the program; and(C) Any applicable statutory ceiling on the loan interest rate includingan allowance to cover administrative costs and probable losses under theprogram.(ii) The date of submission of a request for conditional or firm commitmentis the date that the Borrower submits the complete and acceptable requestto HUD under andSection; 885.800. The date of the submission of a requestfor commitment will not be affected by any subsequent resubmission of therequest by the Borrower or by any reprocessing of the request by HUD.(iii) The Borrower may withdraw its election of the optional interest rateat any time before initial loan closing. If the Borrower elected the optionalinterest rate with its request for conditional commitment and withdrawsits election, the loan will bear interest at the rate determined underparagraph (f)(1), of this section, unless the Borrower elects an optionalinterest rate with its request for firm commitment. If the Borrower withdrawsits election after the date of submission of its request for firm commitment,the loan will bear interest at the rate determined under paragraph (f)(1)of this section.(iv) If initial loan closing has not occurred within 18 months after theNotice of Section 202 Fund Reservation is issued, the Borrower's electionof the optional rate will be cancelled and the loan will bear interestat the rate determined under paragraph (f)(1) of this section.(3) <T3>Allowance for administrative costs and probable losses. </T3>For thepurpose of computing the loan interest rate under paragraphs (f)(1) and(2) of this section, the allowance to cover administrative costs and probablelosses under the program is one-fourth of one percent (.25%) per annumfor both the construction and permanent loan periods.(g) <T3>Announcement of interest rates. </T3>(1) HUD will annually announcethe loan interest rate determination under paragraph (f)(1) of this sectionby publishing notice of the rate in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> The <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice will include a statement explaining thebasis for the interest rate determination.(2) Upon the Borrower's request, HUD will provide available current informationconcerning the determination of the interest rate under paragraph (f)(2)of this section.(h) <T3>Security for loan. </T3>The loan will be secured by a first mortgageon real estate in fee simple or a long-term leasehold. The mortgage willbe repayable during a term not to exceed 40 years and will be subject tosuch terms and conditions as HUD may prescribe.(i) <T3>Minimum capital investment.</T3> Borrowers must provide a minimum capitalinvestment of one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the mortgage amount commitedto be disbursed, not to exceed $10,000. Loans made under section 106 ofthe Housing Act of 1968 may not be used to meet the minimum capital investmentrequirement. The minimum capital investment will be placed in escrow atthe initial closing of the section 202 loan and will be held by HUD orby a HUD-approved escrow agent for not less than three years followingthe date of initial occupancy. The escrow account may be used for operatingexpenses or deficits as may be directed by HUD. Any unexpended balanceremaining in the minimum capital investment account at the end of the escrowperiod will be returned to the Borrower.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.812 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prepayment of loans.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Prepayment prohibition. </T3>The prepayment (whether in whole or inpart) or the assignment or transfer of physical and financial assets ofany section 202 project is prohibited, unless the Assistant Secretary givesprior written approval.(b) <T3>HUD-approved prepayment. </T3>Approval for prepayment or transfer willnot be granted unless HUD determines that the prepayment or transfer ofthe loan is a part of a transaction that will ensure the continued operationof the project until the original maturity date of the loan in a mannerthat will provide rental housing for the handicapped families on termsat least as advantageous to existing and future tenants as the terms requiredby the original section 202 loan agreement and any other loan agreementsentered into under other provisions of law.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.815 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements prior to initial loan closing.</ITAG>Before the initial loan closing, the Borrower must furnish such executeddocuments in such form as HUD may require, including the following:(a) Agreement to enter into a project assistance contract.(b) Certificate of incorporation of the Borrower as required by applicableState or local law.(c) Internal Revenue Service Section 501(c)(3) or (4) tax exemption ruling.(d) Certification of relationships and nonprofit motives of the Borrower.(e) Attorney's opinion as to the legal status of the Borrower, buildingpermit, and compliance with zoning laws and requirements.(f) Regulatory agreement for nonprofit section 202 Borrowers.(g) Borrower's oath that the project will not be used for hotel or transientpurposes.(h) Agreement and certification to certify actual costs and as to any financialand family relationships between the Borrower, the architect, general contractorand subcontractors.(i) Assurance of compliance with HUD regulations under Title VI of theCivil Rights Act of 1964.(j) Note and first mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A title policy insuring that the mortgage constitutes a first lienon the project.(l) Building loan agreement setting forth the conditions for loan disbursement.(m) Construction, moderate rehabilitation or substantial rehabilitationcontract between the Borrower and the general contractor (see andSection;885.816 for contract award requirements).(n) Assurance of completion of construction, moderate rehabilitation orsubstantial rehabilitation contract in the form of corporate surety bondsfor payment and performance, each in the amount of 100 percent of the amountof the HUD-estimated construction or rehabilitation cost, or a cash escrowin the amount of 25 percent of the HUD-estimated construction or rehabilitationcost. The corporate surety bond must be issued by a surety company thatis satisfactory to HUD.(o) Escrow agreement in the amount of the cost of any off-site facilitiesfunded by a cash deposit or letter of credit to assure completion of thefacilities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.816 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for awarding construction contracts.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Construction contract award.</T3> Awards shall be made only to responsiblecontractors that possess the potential ability to perform successfullyunder the terms and conditions of a proposed construction contract. Considerationshall be given to such matters as contractor integrity, compliance withpublic policy, record of past performance, and financial and technicalresources.(b) <T3>Negotiated noncompetitive construction contracts. </T3>Competitivelybid contracts are not required. Negotiated noncompetitive contracts mustbe cost-reimbursement contracts with a ceiling price, and may provide anincentive payment to the contractor for early completion.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.820 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Loan disbursement procedures.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General</T3>. Disbursements of loan proceeds shall be made directlyby HUD to or for the account of the Borrower and may be made through anapproved lender, mortgage servicer, title insurance company, or other agentsatisfactory to the Borrower and HUD.(b) <T3>Timing and amount of disbursement.</T3> Disbursements to the Borrowerwill be made on a periodic basis, and in amounts not to exceed the HUD-approvedcost of the portions of construction or rehabilitation work complete andin place (except as modified in paragraph (d) of this section), minus theappropriate holdback, as determined by HUD.(c) <T3>Content of disbursement requisition. </T3>Requisitions for loan disbursementsmust be submitted by the Borrower on forms prescribed by HUD and must beaccompanied by such additional information as HUD may require in orderto approve loan disbursements under this part, including but not limitedto evidence of compliance with the labor standards described at andSection;885.740(d), Department of Labor regulations, all zoning, building and othergovernmental requirements, and such evidence of continued priority of theBorrower's mortgage as HUD may prescribe.(d) <T3>Disbursements for building components stored off-site.</T3> In loandisbursements for building components stored off-site, the term ``buildingcomponent'' will mean any manufactured or pre-assembled part of a structureas defined by HUD and which HUD has designated for off-site storage becauseit is of such size or weight that storage of the components required fortimely construction progress at the construction site is impracticable,or because weather damage or other adverse conditions prevailing at theconstruction site would make storage at the site impracticable or undulycostly. Each building component must be specifically identified for incorporationinto the property as provided under paragraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section.<T3>(1) Storage. </T3>(i) A loan disbursement may be made for up to 90percent of the invoice value (to exclude cost of transportation and storage)of the building components stored off-site if the components are storedat a location approved by HUD.(ii) Each building component shall be adequately marked to be readily identifiablein the inventory of the off-site location. It shall be kept together withall other building components of the same manufacturer intended for usein the same project for which loan disbursements have been made and separateand apart from similar units not for use in the project.(iii) Storage costs, if any, shall be borne by the general contractor.<T3>(2) Responsibility for transportation, storage and insurance of off-sitebuilding components. </T3>The general contractor of the project shall havethe responsibility for insuring the components in the name of the Borrowerwhile in transit and storage and for delivering or contracting for thedelivery of the components to the storage area and to the constructionsite, including the payment of freight.<T3>(3) Loan disbursements. </T3>(i) Before a loan disbursement for a buildingcomponent stored off-site is made, the Borrower shall:(A) Obtain a bill of sale for the component;(B) Provide HUD with a security agreement pledged by a first lien on thebuilding components with the exception of such other liens or encumbrancesas may be approved by HUD;(C) File a financing statement in accordance with the Uniform CommercialCode.(ii) Before each loan disbursement for building components stored off-siteis made, the manufacturer and the general contractor shall certify to HUDthat the components, in their intended use, comply with HUD-approved contractplan and specifications.(iii) Loan disbursements may be made only for components stored off-sitein a quantity required to permit the uninterrupted installation on thesite.(iv) The outstanding amount of advances for building components storedoff-site may not exceed 50 percent of the total estimated constructioncost for the project as specified in the construction contract.(v) Payments for building components stored off-site will not be approvedunless the contractor has a corporate surety bond for payment and performanceeach in the amount of 100 percent of the amount of the construction contract.(vi) No single loan disbursement shall be made in an amount less than $10,000.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.825 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Completion of cost certification. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Requisition for final disbursement.</T3> The Borrower must satisfythe requirements for completion of construction, substantial rehabilitation,or acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation and receive allrequired approvals from HUD before submitting a final requisition for disbursementof loan proceeds. (b) <T3>Cost certification.</T3> The Borrower shall submit to the field officeall documentation required for final disbursement of the loan including:(1) A certification of actual cost to the Borrower of the constructioncontract, architectural, legal, organizational, off-site costs, and allother items of eligible expense. The certificate shall not include as actualcosts any kickbacks, rebates, trade discounts, or other similar paymentsto the Borrower or to any of its officers, directors, or members. (2) For projects with a mortgage of $750,000 or more, a verification ofthe certificate of actual cost by an independent public accountant acceptableto the field office. (3) A certification of the general contractor (and of such subcontractors,material suppliers, and equipment lessors as HUD may require) on a formprescribed by HUD, as to all actual costs paid for labor, materials, andsubcontract work under the general contract exclusive of the builder'sfee and kickbacks, rebates, trade discounts, or other similar paymentsto the general contractor, the Borrower and any of its officers, directors,stockholders, partners or members. (c) <T3>Reduction of loan amount and contract rents.</T3> If the certifiedcosts provided under paragraph (b) of this section and approved by HUDare less than the loan amount established under andSection; 885.805, theloan amount and the contract rents will be reduced accordingly. (d) <T3>Recovery of overpayment.</T3> If the contract rents are reduced underparagraph (c) of this section, the maximum annual commitment under thePAC will be reduced. If contract rents are reduced based on cost certificationsmade after PAC execution, any overpayment after the effective date of thecontract will be recovered from the Borrower by HUD. <ITAG tagnum="84">Project Assistance Contract </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.900 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Project assistance contract. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Project assistance contract (PAC).</T3> The PAC sets forth rights andduties of the Borrower and HUD with respect to the project and the projectassistance payments. (b) <T3>PAC execution.</T3> (1) Upon satisfactory completion of the project,the Borrower and HUD shall execute the PAC on the form prescribed by HUD.(2) The effective date of the PAC may be earlier than the date of execution,but no earlier than the date of HUD's issuance of the permission to occupy.(3) If the project is completed in stages, the procedures of this paragraph(b) shall apply to each stage. (c) <T3>Project assistance payments to owners under the PAC.</T3> The projectassistance payments made under the PAC are: (1) Payments to the Borrower to assist eligible families leasing assistedunits. The amount of the project assistance payment made to the Borrowerfor an assisted unit (or residential space in a group home) that is leasedto an eligible family is equal to the difference between the contract rentfor the unit (or pro rata share of the contract rent in a group home) andthe tenant rent payable by the family. (2) Payments to the Borrower for vacant assisted units (``vacancy payments'').The amount of and conditions for vacancy payments are described in andSection;885.985.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The project assistance payments are made monthly by HUD upon properrequisition by the Borrower, except payments for vacancies of more than60 days, which are made semiannually by HUD upon requisition by the Borrower.(d) <T3>Payment of utility reimbursement.</T3> Where applicable, a utilityreimbursement will be paid to a family occupying an assisted unit in anindependent living complex as an additional project assistance payment.The PAC will provide that the Borrower will make this payment on behalfof HUD. Funds will be paid to the Borrower in trust solely for the purposeof making the additional payment. The Borrower may pay the utility reimbursementjointly to the family and the utility company, or, if the family and utilitycompany consent, directly to the utility company. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.905 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Term of PAC. </ITAG>The term of the PAC shall be 20 years. If the project is completed in stages,the term of the PAC for each stage shall be 20 years. The term of the PACfor stages of a project shall not exceed 22 years. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.910 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maximum annual commitment and project account. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Maximum annual commitment. </T3> The maximum annual amount that maybe committed under the PAC is the total of the initial contract rents andutility allowances for all assisted units in the project. (b) <T3>Project account. </T3>(1) HUD will establish and maintain a specificallyidentified and segregated project account for each project. The projectaccount will be established out of the amounts by which the maximum annualcommitment exceeds the amount actually paid out under the PAC each year.HUD will make payments from this account for project assistance paymentsas needed to cover increases in contract rents or decrease in tenant incomeand other payments for cost specifically approved by the Secretary. (2) If the HUD-approved estimate of required annual payments under thePAC for a fiscal year exceeds the maximum annual commitment for that fiscalyear plus the current balance in the project account, HUD will, withina reasonable time, take such steps authorized by section 202(h)(4)(A) ofthe Housing Act of 1959, as may be necessary, to assure that payments underthe PAC will be adequate to cover increases in contract rents and decreasesin tenant income. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.915 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Leasing to eligible families. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Availability of assisted units for occupancy by eligible families.</T3>During the term of the PAC, a Borrower shall make all units (or residentialspaces in a group home) available for eligible families. For purposes ofthis section, making units or residential spaces available for occupancyby eligible families means that the Borrower: (1) Is conducting marketing in accordance with andSection; 885.940(a); (2) Has leased or is making good faith efforts to lease the units or residentialspaces to eligible and otherwise acceptable families, including takingall feasible actions to fill vacancies by renting to such families; and(3) Has not rejected any such applicant family except for reasons acceptableto HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">If the Borrower is temporarily unable to lease all units or residentialspaces to eligible families, one or more units or residential spaces may,with the prior approval of HUD, be leased to otherwise eligible familiesthat do not meet the income requirements of Part 813, as modified by andSection;885.5. Failure on the part of the Borrower to comply with these requirementsis a violation of the PAC and grounds for all available legal remedies,including an action for specific performance of the PAC, suspension ordebarment from HUD programs, and reduction of the number of units (or inthe case of group homes, reduction of the number of residential spaces)under the PAC as set forth in paragraph (b) of this section. (b) <T3>Reduction of number of units covered by the PAC. </T3>HUD may reducethe number of units (or in the case of group homes, the number of residentialspaces) covered by the PAC to the number of units or residential spacesavailable for occupancy by eligible families if: (1) The Borrower fails to comply with the requirements of paragraph (a)of this section; or (2) Notwithstanding any prior approval by HUD, HUD determines that theinability to lease units or residential spaces to eligible families isnot a temporary problem. (c) <T3>Restoration.</T3> HUD will agree to an amendment of the PAC to providefor subsequent restoration of any reduction made under paragraph (b) ofthis section if: (1) HUD determines that the restoration is justified by demand; (2) The Borrower otherwise has a record of compliance with the Borrower'sobligationsunder the PAC; and (3) Contract and budget authority is available. (d) <T3>Occupancy by families that are not handicapped.</T3> HUD may relievethe Borrower of the requirement that all units in the project (or residentialspaces in a group home) must be leased to handicapped families if: (1) The Borrower has made reasonable efforts to lease to eligible families;(2) The Borrower has been granted HUD approval under paragraph (a) of thissection; and (3) The Borrower is temporarily unable to achieve or maintain a level ofoccupancy sufficient to prevent financial default and foreclosure underthe section 202 loan documents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">HUD approval under this paragraph will be of limited duration. Hudmay impose terms and conditions to this approval that are consistent withprogram objectives and necessary to protect its interest in the section202 loan. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.920 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PAC Administration. </ITAG>HUD is responsible for the administration of the PAC. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.925 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Default by Borrower. </ITAG>(a) <T3>PAC provisions. </T3>The PAC will provide: (1) That if HUD determines that the Borrower is in default under the PAC,HUD will notify the Borrower of the actions required to be taken to curethe default and of the remedies to be applied by HUD including an actionfor specific performance under the PAC, reduction or suspension of projectassistance payment and recovery of overpayments, where appropriate; and(2) That if the Borrower fails to cure the default, HUD has the right toterminate the PAC or to take other corrective action. (b) <T3>Loan provisions.</T3> Additional provisions governing default underthe section 202 loan are included in the regulatory agreement and otherloan documents described in andSection; 885.815. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.930 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice upon PAC expiration. </ITAG>The PAC will provide that the Borrower will, at least 90 days before theend of the PAC contract term, notify each family occupying an assistedunit (or residential space in a group home) of any increase in the amountthe family will be required to pay as rent as a result of the expiration.The notice of expiration will contain such information and will be servedin such manner as HUD may prescribe. <ITAG tagnum="84">Project Management </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.940 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of Borrower. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Marketing.</T3> (1) The Borrower must commence and continue diligentmarketing activities not later than 90 days before the anticipated dateof availability for occupancy of the group home or the anticipated dateof availability of the first unit in an independent living complex. (2) Marketing must be done in accordance with HUD-approved affirmativefair housing marketing plan and all fair housing and equal opportunityrequirements. The purpose of the plan and requirements is to achieve acondition in which eligible families of similar income levels in the samehousing market have a like range of housing choices available to them regardlessof their race, color, creed, religion, sex or national origin. (3) At the time of PAC execution, the Borrower must submit to HUD a listof leased and unleased assisted units (or in the case of a group home,leased and unleased residential spaces) with a justification for the unleasedunits or residential spaces, in order to qualify for vacancy payments forthe unleased units or residential spaces. (b) <T3>Management and maintenance.</T3> The Borrower is responsible for allmanagement functions. These functions include selection and admission oftenants, required reexaminations of incomes for families occupying assistedunits or residential spaces, collection of rents, termination of tenancyand eviction, and all repair and maintenance functions (including ordinaryand extraordinary maintenance and replacement of capital items). All functionsmust be performed in compliance with equal opportunity requirements. (c) <T3>Contracting for services.</T3> (1) With HUD approval, the Borrowermay contract with a private or public entity for performance of the servicesor duties required in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. However,such an arrangement does not relieve the Borrower of responsibility forthese services and duties. All such contracts are subject to the restrictionsgoverning prohibited contractual relationships described in andSection; 885.735.(These prohibitions do not extend to management contracts entered intoby the Borrower with the Sponsor or its non-profit affiliate.) (2) Consistent with the objectives of Executive Orders 11625, 12432 and12138, the Borrower will promote awareness and participation of minorityand women's business enterprises in contracting and procurement activities.(d) <T3>Submission of financial and operating statements.</T3> The Borrowermust submit to HUD: (1) Within 60 days after the end of each fiscal year of project operations,financial statements for the project audited by an independent public accountantand in the form required by HUD, and (2) Other statements regarding project operation, financial conditionsand occupancy as HUD may require to administer the PAC and to monitor projectoperations. (e) <T3>Use of project funds.</T3> The Borrower shall maintain a project fundaccount in a HUD-approved depository and shall deposit all rents, charges,income and revenues arising from project operation or ownership to thisaccount. Project funds must be used for the operation of the project, tomake required principal and interest payments on the section 202 loan,and to make required deposits to the replacement reserve under andSection;885.945, in accordance with a HUD-approved budget. Any funds remainingin the project funds account following the expiration of the fiscal yearshall be deposited in the replacement reserve account under andSection; 885.945.(f) <T3>Reports.</T3> The Borrower shall submit such reports as HUD may prescribeto demonstrate compliance with applicable civil rights and equal opportunityrequirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.945 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Replacement reserve. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Establishment of reserve.</T3> The Borrower shall establish and maintaina replacement reserve to aid in funding extraordinary maintenance, andrepair and replacement of capital items. (b) <T3>Deposits to reserve.</T3> The Borrower shall make monthly depositsto the replacement reserve. The amount of the deposit for the initial yearof operation shall be an amount equal to 0.6 percent of the cost of thetotal structures (for new construction projects), 0.4 percent of the costof the initial mortgage amount (for all other projects), or such higherrate as required by HUD. For the purposes of this section, total structuresinclude main buildings, accessory buildings, garages and other buildings.The amount of the deposits will be adjusted each year by the amount ofthe annual adjustment factor as described in Part 888. (c) <T3>Level of reserve. </T3>The reserve must be built up to and maintainedat a level determined by HUD to be sufficient to meet projected requirements.Should the reserve reach that level, the amount of the deposit to the reservemay be reduced with the approval of HUD. (d) <T3>Administration of reserve. </T3>Replacement reserve funds must be depositedwith HUD or in a HUD-approved depository in an interest-bearing account.All earnings including interest on the reserve must be added to the reserve.The Borrower shall maintain separate records indicating the amount of fundsdeposited to the replacement reserve under andSection;andSection; 885.940(e)and 885.950(b). Funds may be drawn from the reserve and used only in accordancewith HUD guidelines and with the approval of, or as directed by, HUD. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.950</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection and admission of tenants. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Application for admission. </T3>The Borrower must accept applicationsfor admission to the project in the form prescribed by HUD. Applicant familiesapplying for assisted units (or residential spaces in a group home) mustcomplete a certification of eligibility as part of the application foradmission. Both the Borrower and the applicant family must complete andsign the application for admission. On request, the Borrower must furnishcopies of all applications for admission to HUD. (b) <T3>Determination of eligibility and selection of tenants. </T3>The Borroweris responsible for determining whether applicants are eligible for admissionand for the selection of families. To be eligible for admission, an applicantfamily must be a handicapped family as defined in andSection; 885.5, mustmeet any project occupancy requirements approved by HUD under andSection;885.755(a)(1), and must be a lower income family as defined in andSection;813.102 of this chapter, as modified under andSection; 885.5. Under certaincircumstances, HUD may permit the leasing of units (or residential spacein a group home) to ineligible families under andSection; 885.915. (1) Local residency requirements are prohibited. Local residency preferencesmay be applied in selecting tenants only to the extent that they are notinconsistent with affirmative fair housing marketing objectives and theBorrower's HUD-approved affirmative fair housing marketing plan. Preferencesmay not be based on the length of time the applicant has resided in thejurisdiction. With respect to any residency preference, persons expectedto reside in the community as a result of current or planned employmentwill be treated as residents. (2) If the Borrower determines that the family is eligible and is otherwiseacceptable and units (or residential spaces in a group home) are available,the Borrower will assign the family a unit or residential space in a grouphome. If the family will occupy an assisted unit the Borrower will assignthe family a unit of the appropriate size in accordance with HUD standards.If no suitable unit (or residential space in a group home) is available,the Borrower will place the family on a waiting list for the project andnotify the family when a suitable unit or residential space may becomeavailable. If the waiting list is so long that the applicant would notbe likely to be admitted for the next 12 months, the Borrower may advisethe applicant that no additional applications for admission are being consideredfor that reason. (3) If the Borrower determines that an applicant is ineligible for admissionor the Borrower is not selecting the applicant for other reasons, the Borrowerwill proptly notify the applicant in writing of the determination, thereasons for the determination, and that the applicant has a right to requesta meeting to review the rejection, in accordance with HUD requirements.The review, if requested, may not be conducted by a member of the Borrower'sstaff who made the initial decision to reject the applicant. The applicantmay also exercise other rights if the applicant believes the applicantis being discriminated against on the basis of race, color, creed, religion,sex, handicap or national origin. (4) Records on applicants and approved eligible families, which provideracial, ethnic, gender and place of previous residency data required byHUD, must be maintained and retained for three years. (c) <T3>Reexamination of family income and composition_</T3>(1) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>If the family occupies an assisted unit(or residential space in a group home), the Borrower must reexamine theincome and composition of the family at least every 12 months. Upon verificationof the information, the Borrower shall make appropriate adjustments inthe total tenant payment in accordance with Part 813, as modified by andSection;885.5, and determine whether the family's unit size is still appropriate.The Borrower must adjust tenant rent and the project assistance paymentand must carry out any unit transfer in accordance with HUD standards.(2) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>If the family occupies an assisted unit(or residential space in a group home) the family must comply with provisionsin the lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the Borrowerreceives information concerning a change in the family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the Borrowermust consult with the family and make any adjustments determined to beappropriate. Any change in the family's income or other cicumstances thatresults in an adjustment in the total tenant payment, tenant rent and projectassistance payment must be verified. (3) <T3>Continuation of project assistance payment. </T3>(i) A family occupyingan assisted unit (or residential space in a group home) shall remain eligiblefor project assistance payment until the total tenant payment equals orexceeds the gross rent (or a pro rata share of the gross rent in a grouphome). The termination of subsidy eligibility will not affect the family'sother rights under its lease. Project assistance payment may be resumedif, as a result of changes in income, rent or other relevant circumstancesduring the term of the PAC, the family meets the income eligibility requirementsof Part 813 (as modified in andSection; 885.5) and project assistance isavailable for the unit or residential space under the terms of the PAC.The family will not be required to establish its eligibility for admissionto the project under the remaining requirements of paragraph (b) of thissection. (ii) A family's eligibility for project assistance payment also may beterminated in accordance with HUD requirements for such reasons as failureto submit requested verification information. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.955</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Obligations of the family. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirements. </T3>The family shall: (1) Pay amounts due under the lease directly to the Borrower. (2) Supply such certification, release, information or documentation asthe Borrower or HUD determines to be necessary. (For families occupyingassisted units (or residential spaces in a group home), this will includesubmissions required for an annual or interim reexamination of family incomeand composition.) (3) Allow the Borrower to inspect the dwelling unit or residential spaceat reasonable times and after reasonable notice.(4) Notify the Borrower before vacating the dwelling unit or residentialspace.  (5) Use the dwelling unit or residential unit space solely for residenceby the family, and as the family's principal place of residence.  (b) <T3>Prohibitions</T3>. The family shall not:  (1) Assign the lease or transfer the unit or residential space.  (2) Occupy, or receive assistance for the occupancy of, a unit or residentialspace governed under this part while occupying, or receiving assistancefor occupany of, another unit assisted under any Federal housing assistanceprogram, including any section 8 program.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.960</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Overcrowded and underoccupied units.  </ITAG>If the Borrower determines that because of change in family size, an assistedunit is larger or smaller than appropriate for the eligible family to whichit is leased, project assistance payment with respect to the unit willnot be reduced or terminated until the eligible family has been relocatedto an appropriate alternate unit. If possible, the Borrower will, as promptlyas possible, offer the family an appropriate alternate unit. The Borrowermay receive vacancy payments for the vacated unit if the Borrower complieswith the requirements of andSection;885.985.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.965</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lease requirements.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Term of lease</T3>. The term of the lease may not be less than oneyear. Unless the lease has been terminated by appropriate action, uponexpiration of the lease term, the family and Borrower may execute a newlease for a term not less than one year, or may take no action. If no actionis taken, the lease will automatically be renewed for successive termsof one month.  (b) <T3>Termination by the family</T3>. All leases may contain a provisionthat permits the family to terminate the lease upon 30 days' advance notice.A lease for a term, that exceeds one year must contain such provision.(c) <T3>Form</T3>. The form of lease must contain all required provisions,and none of the prohibited provisions specified in HUD handbooks. In additionto required provisions in the handbook governing the Borrower's entry ontothe leased premises during tenancy, the Borrower may include a provisionin the lease permitting the Borrower to enter the leased premises, at anytime, without advance notice, where there is reasonable cause to believethat an emergency exists or that health or safety of a family member isendangered.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.970</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of tenancy and modification of lease.  </ITAG>The provisions of Part 247 of this title apply to all decisions by a Borrowerto terminate the tenancy or modify the lease of a family residing in aunit (or residential space in a group home).  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.972</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Security deposits.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Collection of security deposit</T3>. At the time of the initial executionof the lease, the Borrower: (1) Will require each family occupying an assistedunit (or residential space in a group home) to pay a security deposit inan amount equal to one month's total tenant payment or $50, whichever isgreater; and (2) may require each family occupying an unassisted unit (orresidential space in a group home) to pay a security deposit equal to onemonth's rent payable by the family. The family is expected to pay the securitydeposit from its own resources and other available public or private resources.The Borrower may collect the security deposit on an installment basis. (b) <T3>Security deposit provisions applicable to assisted and unassisted units_</T3><T3>(1) Administration of security deposit.</T3> The Borrower must placethe security deposits in a segregated interest-bearing account. The Borrowershall maintain a record of the amount in this account that is attributableto each family in residence in the project. Annually for all families,and when computing the amount available for disbursement under paragraph(b)(3) of this section, the Borrower shall allocate to the family's balancethe interest accrued on the balance during the year. Unless prohibitedby State or local law, the Borrower may deduct for the family, from theaccrued interest for the year, the administrative cost of computing theallocation to the family's balance. The amount of the administrative costadjustment shall not exceed the accrued interest allocated to the family'sbalance for the year. The amount of the segregated, interest-bearing accountmaintained by the Borrower must at all times equal the total amount collectedfrom the families then in occupancy, plus any accrued interest and lessallowable administrative cost adjustments. The Borrower must comply withany applicable State and local laws concerning interest payments on securitydeposits.  (2) <T3>Family notification requirement</T3>. In order to be considered forthe refund of the security deposit, a family must provide the Borrowerwith a forwarding address or arrange to pick up the refund.  (3) <T3>Use of security deposit</T3>. The Borrower, subject to State and locallaw and the requirements of this paragraph, may use the family's securitydeposit balance as reimbursement for any unpaid family contribution orother amount which the family owes under the lease. Within 30 days (orshorter time if required by State or local law) after receiving notificationunder paragraph (b)(2) of this section the Borrower must:  (i) Refund to a family owing no rent or other amount under the lease thefull amount of the family's security deposit balance;  (ii) Provide to a family owing rent or other amount under the lease a listitemizing any unpaid rent, damages to the unit, and estimated costs forrepair, along with a statement of the family's rights under State and locallaw. If the amount which the Borrower claims is owed by the family is lessthan the amount of the family's security deposit balance, the Borrowermust refund the excess balance to the family. If the Borrower fails toprovide the list, the family will be entitled to the refund of the fullamount of the family's security deposit balance.    (4) <T3>Disagreements</T3>. If a disagreement arises concerning reimbursementof the security deposit, the family will have the right to present objectionsto the Borrower in an informal meeting. The Borrower must keep a recordof any disagreements and meetings in a tenant file for inspection by HUD.The procedures of this paragraph do not preclude the family from exercisingits rights under State or local law.(5) <T3>Decedent's interest in security deposit. </T3>Upon the death of a memberof a family, the decedent's interest, if any, in the security deposit willbe governed by State or local law.(c) <T3>Reimbursement by HUD for assisted units. </T3>If the family's securitydeposit balance is insufficient to reimburse the Borrower for any unpaidtenant rent or other amount which the family owes under the lease for anassisted unit or residential space and the Borrower has provided the familywith the list required by paragraph (b)(3)(ii) of this section, the Borrowermay claim reimbursement from HUD for an amount not to exceed the lesserof:(1) The amount owed the Borrower, or(2) One month's contract rent, minus the amount of the family's securitydeposit balance. Any reimbursement under this section will be applied firsttoward any unpaid tenant rent due under the lease. No reimbursement maybe claimed for unpaid rent for the period after termination of the tenancy.The Borrower may be eligible for vacancy payments following a vacancy inaccordance with the requirements of andSection; 885.985.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.975</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Adjustment of rents.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Contract rents. </T3>HUD will calculate contract rent adjustments basedon the sum of the project's operating costs and debt service (as calculatedby HUD), with adjustments for vacancies, the project's non-rental income,and other factors that HUD deems appropriate. The calculation will be madeon the basis of information provided by the Borrower on a form prescribedby HUD.(b) <T3>Rent for unassisted units. </T3>The rent payable by families occupyingunits or residential spaces that are not assisted under the PAC shall beequal to the contract rent computed under paragraph (a) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.980 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Adjustment of utility allowances.</ITAG>In connection with adjustments of contract rents as provided in andSection;885.975(a), the Borrower must submit an analysis of any utility allowancesapplicable in an independent living complex. Such data as changes in utilityrates and other facts affecting utility consumption should be providedas part of this analysis to permit appropriate adjustments in the utilityallowances for assisted units. In addition, when approval of a utilityrate change would result in a cumulative increase of 10 percent or morein the most recently approved utility allowances, the Borrower must adviseHUD and request approval of new utility allowances. Whenever a utilityallowance for an assisted unit is adjusted, the Borrower will promptlynotify affected families and make a corresponding adjustment of the tenantrent and the amount of the project assistance payment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.985</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conditions for receipt of vacancy payments for assisted units.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Vacancy payments under the PAC will not be made unlessthe conditions for receipt of these project assistance payments set forthin this section are fulfilled.(b) <T3>Vacancies during rent-up. </T3>For each unit (or residential spacein a group home) that is not leased as of the effective date of the PAC,the Borrower is entitled to vacancy payments in the amount of 80 percentof the contract rent (or pro rata share of the contract rent for a grouphome) for the first 60 days of vacancy, if the Borrower:(1) Conducted marketing in accordance with andSection; 885.940(a) and otherwisecomplied with andSection; 885.940;(2) Has taken and continues to take all feasible actions to fill the vacancy;and(3) Has not rejected any eligible applicant except for good cause acceptableto HUD.(c) <T3>Vacancies after rent-up. </T3>If an eligible family vacates an assistedunit (or residential space in a group home) the Borrower is entitled tovacancy payments in the amount of 80 percent of the contract rent (or prorata share of the contract rent in a group home) for the first 60 daysof vacancy if the Borrower:(1) Certifies that it did not cause the vacancy by violating the lease,the PAC, or any applicable law;(2) Notified HUD of the vacancy or prospective vacancy and the reasonsfor the vacancy immediately upon learning of the vacancy or prospectivevacancy;(3) Has fulfilled and continues to fulfill the requirements specified inandSection; 885.940(a) (2) and (3) and andSection; 885.985(b) (2) and (3);and(4) For any vacancy resulting from the Borrower's eviction of an eligiblefamily, certifies that it has complied with andSection; 885.970.(d) <T3>Vacancies for longer than 60 days. </T3>If an assisted unit (or residentialspace in a group home) continues to be vacant after the 60-day period specifiedin paragraph (b) or (c) of this section, HUD may approve additional vacancypayments for 60-day periods up to a total of twelve months in an amountequal to the principal and interest payments required to amortize thatportion of the debt service attributable to the vacant unit (or, in thecase of group homes, the residential space). Such payments may be approvedif:(1) The unit was in decent, safe and sanitary condition during the vacancyperiod for which payment is claimed;(2) The Borrower has fulfilled and continues to fulfill the requirementsspecified in paragraph (b) or (c) of this section, as appropriate; and(3) The Borrower has demonstrated to the satisfaction of HUD that:(i) For the period of vacancy, the project is not providing the Borrowerwith revenues at least equal to project expenses (exclusive of depreciation)and the amount of payments requested is not more than the portion of thedeficiency attributable to the vacant unit (or residential space in a grouphome) and(ii) The project can achieve financial soundness within a reasonable time.(e) <T3>Prohibition of double compensation for vacancies. </T3>If the Borrowercollects payments for vacancies from other sources (tenant rent, securitydeposits, payments under andSection; 885.972(c), or governmental paymentsunder other programs), the Borrower shall not be entitled to collect vacancypayments to the extent these collections from other sources plus the vacancypayment exceed contract rent.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 21, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">James E. Schoenberger,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">General Deputy Assistant Secretary for Housing, Federal Housing Commissioner.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-24884 Filed 11-1-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4210-27-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>